Table of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended February 2, 2020
or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from              to    
Commission file number 1-8207
THE HOME DEPOT , INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware  95-3261426
(State or other jurisdiction incorporation or organization)  (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
2455 Paces Ferry Road   
Atlanta, Georgia   30339
(Address of principal executive of fices)   (Zip Code)
Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code: (770) 433-8211                 
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Trading Symbol  Name of each exchange on which registered
Common Stock, $0.05 Par V alue Per Share  HD  New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that
the registrant was required to submit such files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , a smaller
reporting company , or an emerging growth company . See the definitions of “large accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller
reporting company ,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer  ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐ Emerging growth
company ☐    
If an emerging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☒
The aggregate market value of voting common stock held by non-af filiates of the registrant on August 4, 2019  was $232.3  billion .
The number of shares outstanding of the registrant’ s common stock as of March 6, 2020  was 1,074,741,592  shares.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Portions of the registrant’ s proxy statement for the 2020  Annual Meeting of Shareholders are incorporated by reference in Part III of
this Form 10-K to the extent described herein.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Commonly Used or Defined Terms ii
Cautionary Statement Pursuant to the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 iii
  
PART I  
Item 1.Business. 1
Item 1A.Risk Factors. 8
Item 1B.Unresolved Staff Comments. 16
Item 2.Properties. 17
Item 3.Legal Proceedings. 18
Item 4.Mine Safety Disclosures. 19
  
PART II 
Item 5.Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities.19
Item 6.Selected Financial Data. 20
Item 7.Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. 21
Item 7A.Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk. 28
Item 8.Financial Statements and Supplementary Data. 29
Item 9.Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure. 61
Item 9A.Controls and Procedures. 61
Item 9B.Other Information. 63
  
PART III 
Item 10.Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance. 63
Item 11.Executive Compensation. 64
Item 12.Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters. 64
Item 13.Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence. 64
Item 14.Principal Accounting Fees and Services. 65
  
PART IV 
Item 15.Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules. 65
Item 16.Form 10-K Summary. 69
  
SIGNATURES 70
i
Table of Contents
COMMONLY USED OR DEFINED TERMS
Term Definition
ASR Accelerated share repurchase
ASU Accounting Standards Update
ASU No. 2014-09 Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606)
BODFS Buy Online, Deliver From Store
BOPIS Buy Online, Pick-up In Store
BORIS Buy Online, Return In Store
BOSS Buy Online, Ship to Store
CDP The not-for-profit organization formerly known as the Carbon Disclosure Project
CFL Compact fluorescent light
Comparable salesAs defined in the Results of Operations and Non-GAAP Financial Measures section of MD&A
DIFM Do-It-For-Me
DIY Do-It-Yourself
EH&S Environmental, Health, and Safety
EPA U.S. Environmental Protection Agency
ESPP Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Exchange Act Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended
FASB Financial Accounting Standards Board
FIRST phone Web-enabled handheld device used by associates in our stores
fiscal 2014 Fiscal year ended February 1, 2015 (includes 52 weeks)
fiscal 2015 Fiscal year ended January 31, 2016 (includes 52 weeks)
fiscal 2016 Fiscal year ended January 29, 2017 (includes 52 weeks)
fiscal 2017 Fiscal year ended January 28, 2018 (includes 52 weeks)
fiscal 2018 Fiscal year ended February 3, 2019 (includes 53 weeks)
fiscal 2019 Fiscal year ended February 2, 2020 (includes 52 weeks)
fiscal 2020 Fiscal year ended January 31, 2021 (includes 52 weeks)
FSC Forest Stewardship Council
GAAP U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
Interline The legacy Interline Brands business, now operating as a part of The Home Depot Pro
IRS Internal Revenue Service
LIBOR London interbank offered rate
MD&A Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
MRO Maintenance, repair, and operations
NOPAT Net operating profit after tax
NYSE New York Stock Exchange
PLCC Private label credit card
Pro Professional customer
Restoration Plan Home Depot FutureBuilder Restoration Plan
ROIC Return on invested capital
SEC Securities and Exchange Commission
Securities Act Securities Act of 1933, as amended
SG&A Selling, general, and administrative
Tax Act Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017
ii
Table of Contents
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT PURSUANT TO THE
PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995
Certain statements contained herein, as well as in other filings we make with the SEC and other written and oral
information we release, regarding our future performance constitute “forward-looking statements” as defined in the
Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements may relate to, among other things, the
demand for our products and services; net sales growth; comparable sales; effects of competition; implementation of
store, interconnected retail, supply chain and technology initiatives; inventory and in-stock positions; state of the
economy; state of the housing and home improvement markets; state of the credit markets, including mortgages, home
equity loans, and consumer credit; impact of tariffs; issues related to the payment methods we accept; demand for
credit offerings; management of relationships with our associates, suppliers and vendors; international trade disputes,
natural disasters, public health issues (including pandemics and quarantines), and other business interruptions that
could disrupt supply or delivery of, or demand for, the Company’s products; continuation of share repurchase programs;
net earnings performance; earnings per share; dividend targets; capital allocation and expenditures; liquidity; return on
invested capital; expense leverage; stock-based compensation expense; commodity price inflation and deflation; the
ability to issue debt on terms and at rates acceptable to us; the impact and expected outcome of investigations,
inquiries, claims, and litigation; the effect of accounting charges; the effect of adopting certain accounting standards;
the impact of the Tax Act and other regulatory changes; store openings and closures; financial outlook; and the
integration of acquired companies into our organization and the ability to recognize the anticipated synergies and
benefits of those acquisitions.
Forward-looking statements are based on currently available information and our current assumptions, expectations
and projections about future events. You should not rely on our forward-looking statements. These statements are not
guarantees of future performance and are subject to future events, risks and uncertainties – many of which are beyond
our control, dependent on actions of third parties, or currently unknown to us – as well as potentially inaccurate
assumptions that could cause actual results to differ materially from our expectations and projections. These risks and
uncertainties include, but are not limited to, those described in Item 1A, “Risk Factors,” and elsewhere in this report and
also as may be described from time to time in future reports we file with the SEC.
Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made, and we do not undertake to update these
statements other than as required by law. You are advised, however, to review any further disclosures we make on
related subjects in our filings with the SEC.
iii
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business.
Introduction
The Home Depot, Inc. is the world’s largest home improvement retailer based on net sales for fiscal 2019. We offer our
customers a wide assortment of building materials, home improvement products, lawn and garden products, and décor
products and provide a number of services, including home improvement installation services and tool and equipment
rental. As of the end of fiscal 2019, we had 2,291 The Home Depot stores located throughout the U.S. (including the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the territories of the U.S. Virgin Islands and Guam), Canada, and Mexico. The
Home Depot stores average approximately 104,000 square feet of enclosed space, with approximately 24,000
additional square feet of outside garden area. We also maintain a network of distribution and fulfillment centers, as well
as a number of e-commerce websites. When we refer to “The Home Depot,” the “Company,” “we,” “us” or “our” in this
report, we are referring to The Home Depot, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries.
The Home Depot, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that was incorporated in 1978. Our Store Support Center (corporate
office) is located at 2455 Paces Ferry Road, Atlanta, Georgia 30339. Our telephone number at that address is
(770) 433-8211.
Our Business
Our Strategy
The retail landscape has changed rapidly over the past several years, with customer expectations regarding how, when
and where they want to shop constantly evolving. To meet this challenge, we have had to become more agile in our
response to the changing competitive environment and customer preferences. As a result, in late 2017, we launched
our transformational journey to create the One Home Depot experience, our vision of an interconnected, frictionless
shopping experience that enables our customers to seamlessly blend the digital and physical worlds. We are now two
years into our multi-year, approximately $11 billion accelerated investment program to create this experience. We are
investing in our stores, associates, interconnected and digital experience, Pro customer experience, services business,
supply chain, and product and innovation to drive value for our customers, our associates, our suppliers, and our
shareholders. We are guided in our investments by a “customer-back” approach, focusing on the customer experience
as we invest. This focus has driven investments aimed at providing an interconnected shopping experience, featuring
curated and innovative product choices, personalized for the individual shopper’s needs, which are then delivered in a
fast and cost-efficient manner. To accomplish this, we are executing against five key strategies designed to drive
growth in our business:
•Connect associates to customer needs
•Interconnected experience: connect stores to online, and online to stores
•Connect products and services to customer needs
•Connect product to shelf, site and customer
•Innovate our business model and value chain
Taken together, these strategies are helping us to leverage our competitive advantages and create the One Home
Depot experience that our customers demand. To highlight our evolution and the capabilities we have developed for the
benefit of our customers along this journey, we also changed our tagline in fiscal 2019 to “How Doers Get More
Done™”, with a corresponding marketing campaign designed to show our customers the ways we are making home
improvement easier, faster and more convenient for them. We discuss below many of our efforts and investments in the
context of our five key strategies.
Connect Associates to Customer Needs
As noted above, we have been guided by a focus on our customers in our development of the One Home Depot
experience, and we leverage our knowledgeable and engaged associates, guided by our culture and values, to address
customer needs. We serve two primary customer groups and have developed different approaches to meet their
diverse needs:
•DIY Customers. These customers are typically home owners who purchase products and complete their own
projects and installations. Our associates assist these customers both in our stores and through online
resources and other media designed to provide product and project knowledge. We also offer a variety of
1
Table of Contents
clinics and workshops both to share this knowledge and to build an emotional connection with our DIY
customers.
•Professional Customers (or “Pros”). These customers are primarily professional renovators/remodelers,
general contractors, handymen, property managers, building service contractors and specialty tradesmen,
such as electricians, plumbers and painters. These customers build, renovate, remodel, repair and
maintain residential properties, multifamily properties, hospitality properties and commercial facilities,
including education facilities, healthcare facilities, government buildings and office buildings. We recognize
the great value our Pro customers provide to their clients, and we strive to make the Pros’ job easier and
help them grow their business. We believe that investments aimed at deepening our relationships with our
Pro customers are yielding increased engagement and will continue to translate into incremental spend. As
part of our continued commitment to invest in Pro customer relationships and the significant market
opportunity these customers represent, we have created an enhanced Pro customer experience, both
online and in-store.
At the end of 2018, we announced a new consolidated, go-to-market strategy for all of our Pro initiatives,
including our MRO business (formerly known as Interline), under “The Home Depot Pro” banner. The Home
Depot Pro serves a number of business customers, including hotels, hospitals, apartment/condominium
property managers, educational institutions, government agencies, commercial property managers and
housing authorities. With The Home Depot Pro, Pros have access to a comprehensive offering that includes a
combination of our vast store network, a best-in-class dedicated sales force, quality and affordable products
from trusted brands, an extensive delivery network, and online business solutions that comprise our Pro
ecosystem. Within this Pro ecosystem, we also provide specialized programs such as an expanded MRO
assortment, inventory management solutions, custom product offerings, in-store Pro desk and Pro services,
and enhanced credit programs. We also provide and are continuously working to improve our delivery options
for Pros, including pick up in-store, direct to job site delivery, or ship-to home, to allow us to deliver when,
where and how our customers demand. Online, with our B2B website, our Pros receive a personalized
experience based on their business, their needs, their industry, and their purchasing behavior.
Pro customers are not one-size-fits-all, and The Home Depot Pro offers the level of value-added services that
our diverse Pro customers demand. Our Pro loyalty program, Pro Xtra, provides Pros with benefits related to
useful business services, exclusive product offers, and a purchase monitoring tool to enable receipt lookup and
job tracking of purchases across all forms of payment. We will continue to invest in the Pro customer
experience to provide the services, solutions, support, and online tools they need to grow their businesses.
Intersecting our DIY customers and our Pros are our DIFM customers. These customers are typically home owners
who engage with Pros to complete their project or installation, instead of completing the project or installation
themselves. DIFM customers can purchase a variety of installation services in our stores, online, or in their homes
through in-home consultations. Our installation programs include many categories, such as flooring, cabinets and
cabinet makeovers, countertops, furnaces and central air systems, and windows. We believe that changing
demographics are increasing the demand for our installation services, particularly for our “baby boomer” customers
who may have historically been DIY customers but who are now looking for someone to complete a project for them.
We also believe our focus on serving the Pros who perform services for our DIFM customers will help us drive higher
product sales.
We help our customers finance their projects by offering PLCC products through third-party credit providers. Our PLCC
program includes other benefits, such as a 365-day return policy and, for our Pros, commercial fuel rewards and
extended payment terms. In fiscal 2019, our customers opened approximately 4.8 million new The Home Depot private
label credit accounts, and at the end of fiscal 2019 the total number of The Home Depot active account holders was
approximately 16.7 million. PLCC sales accounted for approximately 23% of net sales in fiscal 2019.
We strive to provide an outstanding customer experience by putting customers first and taking care of our associates.
Our customer experience begins with excellent customer service, and our associates are key to delivering on that
experience. Our goal is to remove complexity and inefficient processes from the stores to allow our associates to focus
on our customers and make working at The Home Depot a better experience.
To this end, we have continued to focus on freight handling capabilities as part of a multi-year, end-to-end initiative to
optimize how product flows from suppliers to our shelves. Among other benefits, this initiative improves on-shelf
availability of products for customers while decreasing the amount of time a store associate spends locating product on
the receiving dock or in overhead storage. Our overhead management application on our FIRST phones helps
associates locate product stored in overhead storage quickly and accurately, saving time, improving the customer
2
Table of Contents
experience, and assisting with inventory management. As part of our strategic investments, we have rolled out our new
order management system, “Order Up,” which consolidates certain of our existing legacy systems into a simple and
intuitive user interface that requires minimal training and significantly decreases associate time required to create, sell,
manage and edit orders. We have also continued to leverage the enhanced labor model we launched in fiscal 2018 to
better align associate activity with customer needs, shifting from a model based on the number of transactions to one
that correlates to the specific volume of activity within each store down to the department level. This change allows us
to better allocate our workforce to provide a best-in-class customer experience. In addition, in fiscal 2019 we expanded
our in-aisle mobile learning solution to all departments to further enhance our store associates’ learning and
development and aid them in assisting customers. This application, which is on the FIRST phone, enables associates
to integrate training into their everyday workstream as well as answer questions and assist customers in real time.
For our Pro sales associates, we have provided a number of tools aimed at helping them to better understand their top
Pro customers. Our MyView system allows our Pro sales associates to access customer data and information, so they
can proactively work with our Pro customers and determine how we can better serve them.
At the end of fiscal 2019, we employed approximately 415,700 associates, of whom approximately 29,500 were
salaried, with the remainder compensated on an hourly basis. Our culture and values promote ongoing investment in
our associates. To attract, reward, and retain qualified associates, we seek to maintain competitive wages in each
market we serve, offer comprehensive benefits geared towards helping associates through various life experiences,
and provide career growth and development opportunities that make working at The Home Depot a more rewarding
experience. We also have a number of programs to recognize stores and individual associates for exceptional
customer service. We measure associate satisfaction and engagement regularly through associate surveys and drive
enhancements based on the feedback we receive. We believe that our employee relations are very good.
Interconnected Experience: Connect Stores to Online, and Online to Stores
Our customers are shopping and interacting with us differently today than they did several years ago. As a result, we
have taken a number of steps to provide our customers with a seamless and frictionless interconnected shopping
experience across our stores, online, on the job site, and in their homes.
We do not view the customer experience as a specific transaction; rather, we believe it encompasses an entire process
from inspiration and know-how, to purchase and fulfillment, and to post-purchase care and support. From the
inspirational point of the purchase journey to providing product know-how, we are investing in the infrastructure and
processes needed to deliver the most relevant marketing messages to our customers based upon what is important for
them today. Customers desire more personalized messaging, so we are focusing on connecting marketing activities
with the online and in-store experiences to create a seamless series of contacts across channels. Doing this well
provides tremendous value to the customer, which in turn drives positive business results.
Our stores remain the hub of our business, and we are investing to improve the customer shopping experience through
easier navigation and increasing the convenience and speed of checkout. For several years, our associates have used
our FIRST phones to help expedite the online order checkout process, locate products in the aisles and online, and
check inventory on hand. To improve the customer’s experience in our stores, we have also empowered our customers
with additional self-help tools, including mobile app-enabled store navigation. Our app provides store-specific maps,
which allow customers to pinpoint the exact location of an item on their mobile devices. As part of our strategic
investments, we have made significant progress with the implementation of our wayfinding sign and store refresh
package, with over 1,400 of our U.S. stores completed by the end of fiscal 2019. This package includes new, more
intuitive signage, better lighting, and other store enhancements. In fiscal 2019, we also continued the roll out of our re-
designed front end area, including reconfigured service desks, optimized layouts in all checkout areas, and expanded
and enhanced self-checkout options, as well as the addition of self-service lockers at the front entrance to offer
convenient pick up of online orders. We believe these investments are driving higher customer satisfaction scores.
The enhanced store experience is complemented by our continued investments in our website and mobile apps to drive
a more interconnected digital customer experience. Enhancements to our digital properties are critical for our
increasingly interconnected customers, who research products online and check available inventory before going into
one of our stores to view the products in person or talk to an associate and then make their purchase in store or online.
While in the store, customers may also go online to access ratings and reviews, compare prices, view our extended
assortment and purchase products. Our investment in digital price labels for our appliance department has enabled us
to incorporate ratings from the digital world into the store shopping experience, enhancing the overall customer
experience in the category.
3
Table of Contents
We believe that by connecting our stores to online and online to our stores, we drive sales not just in-store but also
online. Our focus on improving search capabilities, site functionality, category presentation, product content, speed to
checkout, and enhanced fulfillment options has yielded higher traffic, better conversion and continued sales growth. To
create an enhanced customer experience, we have been expanding our use of technology, including advanced data
science. We have also continued to improve our e-commerce platform with a goal of driving a more personalized
customer experience, as discussed above.
Connect Products and Services to Customer Needs
We strive to be the number one retailer in product authority in home improvement by delivering product innovation,
assortment and value and by offering a range of home improvement services. In fiscal 2019, we continued to invest in
merchandising resets in our stores to refine assortments, introduce a wide range of innovative new products to our DIY
and Pro customers, and improve visual merchandising to drive a better shopping experience. At the same time, we
remain focused on offering everyday values in our stores and online. To help our merchandising organization keep pace
with changing customer expectations and expanding desire for innovation, localization and personalization, we are
investing in tools to better leverage our data and drive a deeper level of collaboration with supplier partners. As a result,
we have continued to focus on enhanced merchandising information technology tools to help us to build an
interconnected shopping experience that is tailored to our customers’ personas, shopping context, and location; ensure
we have the best value in the market; and optimize our product assortments.
A typical The Home Depot store stocks approximately 30,000 to 40,000 items during the year, including both national
brand name and proprietary products. Our online product offerings complement our stores by serving as an extended
aisle, and we offer a significantly broader product assortment through our websites, including homedepot.com;
blinds.com, our online site for custom window coverings; and thecompanystore.com, our online site for textiles and
décor products. We leverage our digital platforms to drive incremental growth from new and adjacent categories like
HD Home, pool and workwear. We also routinely use our merchandising tools to refine our online assortment to
balance the extended choice with a more curated offering.
In fiscal 2019, we introduced a number of innovative and distinctive products to our customers. Examples of these new
products include the Cub Cadet® Ultima™ ZT1 zero turn mower, the DeWalt Atomic 20V platform, ReVent® bath fans,
Jeld-Wen® fiberglass folding patio doors, the Rust-Oleum® HOME Interior Floor Coating System, Behr Ultra™ Scuff
Defense™ Stain Blocking Paint & Primer in One, and the Setra™ kitchen faucet with Kohler® Konnect™ and voice-
activated technology.
During fiscal 2019, we continued to offer value to our customers through a wide range of our proprietary and exclusive
brands and products. Highlights of these offerings include Husky® products, including 144-position tight-fit ratchet sets
and storage solutions; Everbilt® products; Hampton Bay® products, including cordless stock blinds; the GE® Smart
Whole House water filtration system; Glacier Bay® bath fixtures and toilets, including sensor faucets and the Power
Flush toilet; LifeProof® flooring, including rigid core vinyl plank flooring and new waterproof bamboo; Philips™ Smart
Wi-Fi LED bulbs; Vigoro® lawn care products such as landscape fabric; Werner® 5-in-1 multi-position ladders; and
RIDGID® and Ryobi® power tools. We will continue to assess our merchandising departments and product lines for
opportunities to expand the assortment of products offered within The Home Depot’s portfolio of proprietary and
exclusive brands.
We also offer a number of services for our customers. As noted above, we provide a number of special programs for
our Pro customers to meet their particular needs, and for our DIY and DIFM customers, we provide a number of
installation services. We also provide tool and equipment rentals at over 1,200 locations across the U.S. and Canada,
providing value and convenience for both our Pro and DIY customers. As part of our strategic investment program, we
are investing in more space, more tools, and better technology to improve the customer experience and continue to
grow this differentiated service offering.
Connect Product to Shelf, Site and Customer
We continue to drive productivity and efficiency by building best-in-class competitive advantages in our information
technology and supply chain. We recognize that our customers’ expectations are changing rapidly and that our supply
chain needs to be responsive to their expectations for how, when and where they choose to receive our products and
services. As part of our One Home Depot initiative, we are investing approximately $1.2 billion in the multi-year
development of our One Supply Chain network, which is designed to continue to improve productivity and connectivity
across our supply chain platforms to achieve the fastest, most efficient delivery capabilities in home improvement. Our
efforts are focused on ensuring product availability and increasing the speed and reliability of delivery for our customers
while managing our costs, which results in higher returns for our shareholders.
4
Table of Contents
We centrally forecast and replenish over 98% of our store products through sophisticated inventory management
systems and utilize a network of over 200 distribution centers to serve both our stores’ and customers’ needs. This
network includes multiple distribution center platforms in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico tailored to meet the needs of
our stores and customers based on the types of products, location, transportation, and delivery requirements. These
platforms primarily include rapid deployment centers, stocking distribution centers, bulk distribution centers, and direct
fulfillment centers. As part of our investment in One Supply Chain, we have invested to further automate and
mechanize our rapid deployment center network to drive efficiency and faster movement of product.
We are also expanding our fulfillment network, investing in approximately 150 new fulfillment facilities to drive speed
and reliability of delivery for customers and help us meet our goal of reaching 90% of the U.S. population with same or
next day delivery for extended home improvement and MRO product offerings, including big and bulky goods. These
facilities include additional direct fulfillment centers, which deliver product directly to customers, and market delivery
operations, or MDOs, which function as local hubs to consolidate freight for dispatch to customers for the final mile of
delivery, with a focus on items like appliances. We are also adding flatbed distribution centers, which handle large items
like lumber that are transported on flatbed trucks, and market delivery centers, which are focused on distribution of
MRO products and fast-turning store-based products. As of the end of fiscal 2019, we have opened at least one of each
of these four major types of fulfillment facilities and will continue to build out our fulfillment network over the next few
years.
In addition to our distribution centers, we leverage our almost 2,000 U.S. stores as a network of convenient customer
pick-up, return, and delivery fulfillment locations. Our real estate footprint provides a distinct structural and competitive
advantage. For customers who shop online and wish to pick-up or return merchandise at, or have merchandise
delivered from, our U.S. stores, we have fully implemented our four interconnected retail programs, BOSS, BOPIS,
BODFS, and BORIS, which we believe provide us with a competitive advantage. As of the end of fiscal 2019,
approximately 50% of our U.S. online orders were picked up in the store. We also continue to focus on developing new
capabilities to improve both efficiency and customer experience in our store delivery program.
A key component of our strategy is enabled through our technology portfolio, which consists of a network of systems
that help us centrally manage customer orders and optimize where, when and how we fulfill them in order to maximize
speed, efficiency, and the customer’s experience. During fiscal 2019, we continued to improve our customer order
management platform, or COM, and our delivery management system, which substantially improves our ability to sell
and execute deliveries from our stores.
Innovate Our Business Model and Value Chain
In the changing retail environment, we must increase our investments to enhance the interconnected customer
experience and position our Company for the future. Our customers view us as one Home Depot and expect us to
function in an interconnected, seamless manner. To fully realize the One Home Depot experience, we will continue to
connect the various aspects of our business and leverage our scale. We will also invest in our physical locations, our
digital properties, our associates, products and innovation, our Pro and DIY customers, our services business, and our
supply chain. Underlying all of these investments is our continued investment in information technology, which provides
the backbone of the One Home Depot experience.
We continue to focus on driving productivity throughout the business. This process includes lowering our costs and
reinvesting in the business to drive higher sales, creating what we refer to as a virtuous cycle. We support a cycle of
productivity through technology development, improved processes, and simplified systems, driving productivity and
speed across the value chain. This virtuous cycle has allowed us to improve the customer experience, increase our
competitiveness in the market, increase sales, and deliver shareholder value.
Our strategy to create the One Home Depot experience is driven by our desire to create value for all stakeholders,
including our customers, our associates, our supplier partners, the communities we serve, and our shareholders. We
are accelerating our investments in the business within our disciplined approach to capital allocation. Our first use of
cash has been and will continue to be investing in our business, with use of the remainder guided by our shareholder
return principles:
•Dividend Principle. We look to increase our dividend every year as we grow earnings.
•Return on Invested Capital Principle. Our goal is to maintain a high return on invested capital, benchmarking all
uses of excess liquidity against the value created for our shareholders through share repurchases.
•Share Repurchase Principle. After meeting the needs of the business, we will look to return excess cash to
shareholders in the form of share repurchases.
5
Table of Contents
In fiscal 2019, we drove higher returns on invested capital, which allowed us to return value to shareholders through
$7.0 billion in share repurchases and $6.0 billion in cash dividends, as discussed in Item 7, “Management’s Discussion
and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.”
Competition
Our industry is highly competitive, very fragmented, and evolving. As a result, we face competition for our products and
services from a variety of retailers, suppliers, and service providers, ranging from traditional brick-and-mortar, to
multichannel, to exclusively online. In each of the markets we serve, there are a number of other home improvement
retailers; electrical, plumbing and building materials supply houses; and lumber yards. With respect to some products
and services, we also compete with specialty design stores, showrooms, discount stores, local, regional and national
hardware stores, paint stores, mail order firms, warehouse clubs, independent building supply stores, MRO companies,
home décor retailers, and other retailers, as well as with providers of home improvement services and tool and
equipment rental.
We compete, both in-store and online, primarily based on customer experience, price, quality, availability, product
assortment, and delivery options. With respect to our stores, we also compete based on store location and appearance
as well as presentation of merchandise. Further, online and multichannel retailers are increasingly focusing on delivery
services, with customers seeking faster and/or guaranteed delivery times, as well as low-price or free shipping. Our
ability to be competitive on delivery times and delivery costs depends on many factors, including the success of our
investments in One Supply Chain.
Sustainability Efforts
Our environmental, social and governance efforts are focused on taking care of our people and communities while
operating sustainably, The Home Depot is committed to sustainable business practices – from the products that we
offer to our customers, to the environmental impact of our operations, to our sourcing activities, to taking care of our
associates, to our involvement within the communities in which we do business. We believe these efforts continue to be
successful in creating value for our customers, shareholders, associates and communities.
Environmentally Preferred Products and Programs. We offer a growing selection of environmentally preferred
products that support sustainability and help our customers save energy, water and money. Through our Eco Options®
Program introduced in 2007, we have helped our customers more easily identify products that meet specifications for
energy efficiency, water conservation, healthy home, clean air and sustainable forestry. As of the end of fiscal 2019, our
Eco Options® Program included over 25,000 products. Through this program, we sell ENERGY STAR® certified
appliances, LED light bulbs, tankless water heaters, and other products that enable our customers to save on their
utility bills. We estimate that in fiscal 2019 we helped customers save over $1.2 billion in electricity costs through sales
of energy-saving products. We also estimate our customers saved over 52 billion gallons of water resulting in over
$650 million in water bill savings in fiscal 2019 through the sales of our WaterSense®-labeled bath faucets,
showerheads, aerators, toilets, and irrigation controllers.
In 2017, we announced customer energy, greenhouse gas emissions, and water goals, anchored by our sale of
ENERGY STAR® and WaterSense® products. We are committed to providing innovative products that, through proper
use, will help to reduce North American customers’ electricity costs by more than $2.8 billion; greenhouse gas
emissions by 20 million metric tons; and water consumption by 250 billion gallons by 2020. We have a comprehensive
wood purchasing policy that requires FSC certification for wood products from the Amazon basin, Congo basin, Papua
New Guinea, and the Solomon Islands. Our 2019 Responsibility Report, available on our website at
https://corporate.homedepot.com/responsibility, describes these efforts as well as many of our other environmentally
preferred products that promote energy efficiency, water conservation, clean air, and a healthy home.
We continue to offer store recycling programs in the U.S., such as an in-store CFL bulb recycling program launched in
2008. This service is offered to customers free of charge and is available in all U.S. stores. We also maintain an in-
store rechargeable battery recycling program. Launched in 2001 and currently done in partnership with Call2Recycle,
this program is also available to customers free of charge in all U.S. stores. Through our recycling programs, in fiscal
2019 we helped recycle over 800,000 pounds of CFL bulbs and over 1 million pounds of rechargeable batteries. Since
program inception, we have helped recycle over 11 million pounds of rechargeable batteries. In fiscal 2019, we also
recycled over 235,000 lead acid batteries collected from our customers under our lead acid battery exchange program,
as well as over 250,000 tons of cardboard through a nationwide cardboard recycling program across our U.S.
operations. We believe our environmentally-preferred product selection and our recycling efforts drive sales, which in
turn benefits our shareholders, in addition to our customers, the communities in which we work and live, and the
environment.
6
Table of Contents
Commitment to Sustainability and Environmentally Responsible Operations. The Home Depot also focuses on
sustainable operations and is committed to conducting business in an environmentally responsible manner. This
commitment impacts all areas of our operations, including energy usage, supply chain and packaging, and store
construction and maintenance. In 2015, we announced two major sustainability commitments for 2020. Our first goal is
to reduce our U.S. stores’ energy use by 20% over 2010 levels, and our second goal is to produce and procure, on an
annual basis, 135 megawatts of energy for our stores through renewable or alternate energy sources, such as wind,
solar and fuel cell technology. As of the end of fiscal 2019, we have 47 stores with solar rooftop power and 204 fuel cell
systems that are either operational or in development, which puts us on track to exceed both of our goals before the
end of 2020. In 2018, we set a science-based target goal in connection with our annual CDP reporting (discussed
below) with commitments to a 2.1% annual reduction in carbon emissions. Our goal is to achieve a 40% reduction by
2030 and a 50% reduction by 2035. We are committed to implementing strict operational standards that establish
energy efficient operations in all of our U.S. facilities and continuing to invest in renewable and alternative energy.
Additionally, we implemented a rainwater reclamation project in our stores in 2010. As of the end of fiscal 2019, 157 of
our stores used reclamation tanks to collect rainwater and condensation from HVAC units and garden center roofs,
which is in turn used to water plants in our outside garden centers. Our 2019 Responsibility Report provides more
information on these and other sustainability efforts throughout our operations.
Awards and Recognition. Our commitment to corporate sustainability has resulted in a number of environmental
awards and recognitions. Since 2008, we have received 21 significant awards from three EPA programs. Multiple times
over these years, the ENERGY STAR® division has named us “Retail Partner of the Year – Sustained Excellence” for
our overall excellence in energy efficiency, and we have received the WaterSense® Sustained Excellence Award for our
overall excellence in water efficiency. We have also received the EPA’s “SmartWay Excellence Award,” which
recognizes The Home Depot as an industry leader in freight supply chain environmental performance and energy
efficiency.
We participate in the CDP reporting process. CDP is an independent, international, not-for-profit organization providing
a global system for companies and cities to measure, disclose, manage and share environmental information. In
January 2020, for the second year in a row, we received a score of “A” from CDP, reflecting leadership and a high level
of action on climate change mitigation, adaptation and transparency.
Sourcing and Quality Assurance
We maintain a global sourcing program to obtain high-quality and innovative products directly from manufacturers
around the world. During fiscal 2019, in addition to our U.S. sourcing operations, we maintained sourcing offices in
Mexico, Canada, China, India, Vietnam and Europe. To ensure that suppliers adhere to our high standards of social
and environmental responsibility, we also have a global responsible sourcing program. Our suppliers are contractually
obligated to ensure that their products comply with applicable international, federal, state and local laws. All of our
vendors and service providers must also comply with our responsible sourcing standards, which cover a variety of
expectations across multiple areas of social compliance, including supply chain transparency, sources of supply, and
child and forced labor. In addition, we have both quality assurance and engineering resources dedicated to establishing
criteria and overseeing compliance with safety, quality and performance standards for our proprietary branded
products, including conducting factory audits and compliance visits. Our 2019 Responsible Sourcing Report, available
on our website at https://corporate.homedepot.com/responsibility/sourcing-responsibility, provides more information
about this program.
Safety
We are committed to maintaining a safe shopping and working environment for our customers and associates. We are
dedicated to ensuring the health and safety of our customers and associates, by empowering trained EH&S associates
to evaluate, develop, implement and enforce policies, processes and programs on a Company-wide basis. Our EH&S
policies are woven into our everyday operations and are part of The Home Depot culture. Some common program
elements include: daily store inspection checklists (by department); routine follow-up audits from our store-based safety
team members and regional, district and store operations field teams; equipment enhancements and preventative
maintenance programs to promote physical safety; departmental merchandising safety standards; training and
education programs for all associates, with varying degrees of training provided based on an associate’s role and
responsibilities; and awareness, communication and recognition programs designed to drive operational awareness
and an understanding of EH&S matters.
7
Table of Contents
Intellectual Property
Our business has one of the most recognized brands in North America. As a result, we believe that The Home Depot®
trademark has significant value and is an important factor in the marketing of our products, e-commerce, stores and
business. We have registered or applied for registration of trademarks, service marks, copyrights and internet domain
names, both domestically and internationally, for use in our business, including our proprietary brands such as HDX®,
Husky®, Hampton Bay®, Home Decorators Collection®, Glacier Bay®, Vigoro®, Everbilt® and Lifeproof®. We also
maintain patent portfolios relating to some of our products and services and seek to patent or otherwise protect
innovations we incorporate into our products or business operations.
Seasonality
Our business is subject to seasonal influences. Generally, our highest volume of sales occurs in our second fiscal
quarter, and the lowest volume occurs either during our first or fourth fiscal quarter.
Available Information
Our internet website is www.homedepot.com. We make available on the Investor Relations section of our website, free
of charge, our Annual Reports to shareholders, Annual Reports on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q,
Current Reports on Form 8-K, Proxy Statements, and Forms 3, 4 and 5, and amendments to those reports, as soon as
reasonably practicable after filing such documents with, or furnishing such documents to, the SEC.
We include our website addresses throughout this report for reference only. The information contained on our websites
is not incorporated by reference into this report.
Other Financial Information
For information on key financial highlights, including historical revenues, profits and total assets, see the “Selected
Financial Data” on page F-1 of this report and Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition
and Results of Operations.”
Item 1A. Risk Factors.
Our business, results of operations, and financial condition are subject to numerous risks and uncertainties. In
connection with any investment decision with respect to our securities, you should carefully consider the following risk
factors, as well as the other information contained in this report and our other filings with the SEC. Additional risks and
uncertainties not presently known to us or that we currently deem immaterial may also impair our business operations.
Should any of these risks materialize, our business, results of operations, financial condition and future prospects could
be negatively impacted, which in turn could affect the trading value of our securities. You should read these Risk
Factors in conjunction with “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations”
in Item 7 and our consolidated financial statements and related notes in Item 8.
Strong competition could adversely affect prices and demand for our products and services and could
decrease our market share.
Our industry is highly competitive, very fragmented, and evolving. As a result, we face competition for our products and
services from a variety of retailers, suppliers, and service providers, ranging from traditional brick-and-mortar, to
multichannel, to exclusively online. The internet facilitates competitive entry, price transparency, and comparison
shopping, increasing the level of competition we face. In each of the markets we serve, there are a number of other
home improvement retailers; electrical, plumbing and building materials supply houses; and lumber yards. With respect
to some products and services, we also compete with specialty design stores, showrooms, discount stores, local,
regional and national hardware stores, paint stores, mail order firms, warehouse clubs, independent building supply
stores, MRO companies, home décor retailers, and other retailers, as well as with providers of home improvement
services and tool and equipment rental.
We compete, both in-store and online, primarily based on customer experience, price, quality, availability, product
assortment, and delivery options. With respect to our stores, we also compete based on store location and appearance
as well as presentation of merchandise. Further, online and multichannel retailers are increasingly focusing on delivery
services, with customers seeking faster and/or guaranteed delivery times, as well as low-price or free shipping. Our
ability to be competitive on delivery times and delivery costs depends on many factors, including the success of our
investments in One Supply Chain, and our failure to successfully manage these factors and offer competitive delivery
options could negatively impact the demand for our products and our profit margins.
We use our marketing, advertising and promotional programs to drive customer traffic and compete more effectively,
and we must regularly assess and adjust our efforts to address changes in the competitive landscape. Intense
8
Table of Contents
competitive pressures from one or more of our competitors, such as through aggressive promotional pricing or
liquidation events, or our inability to adapt effectively and quickly to a changing competitive landscape, could adversely
affect our prices, our margins, or demand for our products and services. If we are unable to timely and appropriately
respond to these competitive pressures, including through the delivery of a superior customer experience or
maintenance of effective marketing, advertising or promotional programs, our market share and our financial
performance could be adversely affected.
We may not timely identify or effectively respond to consumer needs, expectations or trends, which could
adversely affect our relationship with customers, our reputation, the demand for our products and services,
and our market share.
The success of our business depends in part on our ability to identify and respond promptly to evolving trends in
demographics; consumer preferences, expectations and needs; and unexpected weather conditions, public health
issues (including pandemics and quarantines) or natural disasters, while also managing appropriate inventory levels in
our stores and distribution or fulfillment centers and maintaining an excellent customer experience. It is difficult to
successfully predict the products and services our customers will demand. As our customers begin to expect a more
personalized experience, our ability to collect, use and protect relevant customer data is important to our ability to
effectively meet their expectations. Our ability to collect and use that data, however, is subject to a number of external
factors, including the impact of legislation or regulations governing data privacy and security. In addition, each of our
primary customer groups has different needs and expectations, many of which evolve as the demographics in a
particular customer group change. We also need to offer more localized assortments of our merchandise to appeal to
local cultural and demographic tastes within each customer group. If we do not successfully differentiate the shopping
experience to meet the individual needs and expectations of or within a customer group, we may lose market share
with respect to those customers.
Customer expectations about the methods by which they purchase and receive products or services are also becoming
more demanding. Customers routinely use technology and a variety of electronic devices and digital platforms to
rapidly compare products and prices, read product reviews, determine real-time product availability, and purchase
products. Once products are purchased, customers are seeking alternate options for delivery of those products, and
they often expect quick, timely, and low-price or free delivery. We must continually anticipate and adapt to these
changes in the purchasing process. We have our BOSS, BOPIS, BODFS and direct fulfillment delivery options, but we
cannot guarantee that these or future programs will be maintained and implemented successfully or that we will be able
to meet customer expectations on delivery times, options and costs. Customers are also using social media to provide
feedback and information about our Company and products and services in a manner that can be quickly and broadly
disseminated. To the extent a customer has a negative experience and shares it over social media, it may impact our
brand and reputation.
Further, we have an aging store base that requires maintenance, investment, and space reallocation initiatives to
deliver the shopping experience that our customers desire. Our investments in our stores may not deliver the relevant
shopping experience our customers expect. We must also maintain a safe store environment for our customers and
associates, as well as to protect against loss or theft of our inventory (also called “shrink”). Higher rates of shrink, which
we have recently experienced, can require operational changes that may increase costs and impact the customer
experience.
Failure to improve and maintain our stores, utilize our store space effectively, and offer a safe shopping environment; to
provide a compelling online presence; to timely identify or respond to changing consumer preferences, expectations
and home improvement needs; to maintain appropriate inventory; to provide quick and low-price or free delivery
alternatives; to differentiate the customer experience for our primary customer groups; and to effectively implement an
increasingly localized merchandising assortment could adversely affect our relationship with customers, our reputation,
the demand for our products and services, and our market share.
The implementation of our store, interconnected retail, supply chain and technology initiatives could disrupt
our operations in the near term, and these initiatives might not provide the anticipated benefits or might fail.
We have been substantially increasing our investments to create the One Home Depot experience, including significant
investments over several years to build One Supply Chain. These initiatives are designed to streamline our operations
to allow our associates to continue to provide high-quality service to our customers; simplify customer interactions;
provide our customers with a more interconnected retail experience; and create the fastest, most efficient delivery
network for home improvement products. Failure to choose the right investments and implement them in the right
manner and at the right pace could disrupt our operations. The One Home Depot initiative will require significant
investment in our operations and systems, as well as the development and execution
9
Table of Contents
of new processes, systems and support. The One Supply Chain initiative also involves significant real estate projects
as we expand our distribution network. If we are unable to effectively manage the volume, nature and cost of these
investments, projects and changes, our business operations and financial results could be materially and adversely
affected. The cost and potential problems, defects of design and interruptions associated with the implementation of
these initiatives, including those associated with managing third-party service providers, employing new web-based
tools and services, implementing new technology, implementing and restructuring support systems and processes,
identifying appropriate facility locations, and addressing impacts on inventory levels, could disrupt or reduce the
efficiency of our operations in the near term, lead to product availability issues, and impact profitability. Further,
accomplishing these initiatives will require a substantial investment in additional information technology personnel and
other specialized personnel. We may face significant competition in the market for these resources and may not be
successful in our hiring efforts. In addition, our store and interconnected retail initiatives, One Supply Chain, and new or
upgraded information technology systems might not provide the anticipated benefits, it might take longer than expected
to complete the initiatives or realize the anticipated benefits, or the initiatives might fail altogether, each of which could
adversely impact our competitive position and our financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows.
Our success depends upon our ability to attract, develop and retain highly qualified associates while also
controlling our labor costs.
Our customers expect a high level of customer service and product knowledge from our associates. To meet the needs
and expectations of our customers, we must attract, develop and retain a large number of highly qualified associates
while at the same time controlling labor costs. Our ability to control labor costs is subject to numerous external factors,
including market pressures with respect to prevailing wage rates, unemployment levels, and health and other insurance
costs, as well as the impact of legislation or regulations governing labor relations, minimum wage, and healthcare
benefits. In addition, to support our strategic initiatives, including One Supply Chain, and the related technology
investments needed to implement our strategic investments, we must attract and retain a large number of skilled
professionals, including technology professionals. The market for these professionals is increasingly competitive. An
inability to provide wages and/or benefits that are competitive within the markets in which we operate could adversely
affect our ability to retain and attract associates. Further, changes in market compensation rates may adversely affect
our labor costs. In addition, we compete with other retail businesses for many of our associates in hourly positions, and
we invest significant resources in training and motivating them to maintain a high level of job satisfaction. These
positions have historically had high turnover rates, which can lead to increased training and retention costs, particularly
in a competitive labor market. There is no assurance that we will be able to attract or retain highly qualified associates
in the future.
A failure of a key information technology system or process could adversely affect our business.
We rely extensively on information technology systems to analyze, process, store, manage and protect transactions
and data. Some of these systems are managed or provided by third-party service providers, including certain cloud
platform providers. In managing our business, we also rely heavily on the integrity of, security of, and consistent access
to, this operational and financial data for information such as sales, customer data, associate data, demand forecasting,
merchandise ordering, inventory replenishment, supply chain management, payment processing, and order fulfillment.
For these information technology systems and processes to operate effectively, we or our service providers must
maintain and update them. Our systems and the third-party systems with which we interact are subject to damage or
interruption from a number of causes, including power outages; computer and telecommunications failures; computer
viruses; security breaches or data theft; cyber-attacks, including the use of malicious codes, worms, phishing, spyware,
denial of service attacks, and ransomware; catastrophic events such as fires, floods, earthquakes, tornadoes, or
hurricanes; acts of war or terrorism; and design or usage errors by our associates, contractors or third-party service
providers. Although we and our third-party service providers seek to maintain our respective systems effectively and to
successfully address the risk of compromise of the integrity, security and consistent operations of these systems, such
efforts may not be successful. As a result, we or our service providers could experience errors, interruptions, delays or
cessations of service in key portions of our information technology infrastructure, which could significantly disrupt our
operations or impair data security, and be costly, time consuming and resource-intensive to remedy.
In addition, we are currently making, and expect to continue to make, substantial investments in our information
technology systems and infrastructure, in certain cases with the assistance of strategic partners and other third-party
service providers. These investments involve replacing existing systems with successor systems; outsourcing certain
technology to third-party service providers; making changes to existing systems, including the migration of applications
to the cloud; or designing or cost-effectively acquiring new systems with new functionality. These efforts can result in
significant potential risks, including failure of the systems to operate as designed, potential loss or
10
Table of Contents
corruption of data, changes in security processes, cost overruns, implementation delays, disruption of operations, and
the potential inability to meet business and reporting requirements. Any system implementation and transition difficulty
may result in operational challenges, security failures, reputational harm, and increased costs that could adversely
affect our business operations and results of operations.
Disruptions in our customer-facing technology systems could impair our interconnected retail strategy and
give rise to negative customer experiences.
Through our information technology systems, we are able to provide an improved overall shopping and interconnected
retail experience that empowers our customers to shop and interact with us from a variety of electronic devices and
digital platforms. We use our digital platforms both as sales channels for our products and services and also as
methods of providing inspiration, as well as product, project, and other relevant information to our customers to drive
sales, regardless of whether they occur in-store or online. We have multiple online communities and knowledge centers
that allow us to inform, assist and interact with our customers. The retail industry is continually evolving and expanding,
and we must effectively respond to new developments and changing customer preferences with respect to an
interconnected experience. We continually seek to enhance all of our online and digital properties to provide an
attractive, user-friendly interface for our customers. Disruptions, delays, failures or other performance issues with these
customer-facing technology systems, or a failure of these systems to meet our or our customers’ expectations, could
impair the benefits that they provide to our business and negatively affect our relationship with our customers.
Disruptions in our supply chain and other factors affecting the distribution of our merchandise could
adversely impact our business.
A disruption within our logistics or supply chain network could adversely affect our ability to deliver inventory in a timely
manner, which could impair our ability to meet customer demand for products and result in lost sales, increased supply
chain costs, or damage to our reputation. Such disruptions may result from damage or destruction to our distribution
centers; weather-related events; natural disasters; international trade disputes or trade policy changes or restrictions;
tariffs or import-related taxes; third-party strikes, lock-outs, work stoppages or slowdowns; shortages of truck drivers;
shipping capacity constraints; third-party contract disputes; supply or shipping interruptions or costs; military conflicts;
acts of terrorism; public health issues, including pandemics or quarantines (such as the recent COVID-19 coronavirus
outbreak); or other factors beyond our control. Any such disruption could negatively impact our financial performance or
financial condition.
If our efforts to maintain the privacy and security of customer, associate, supplier and Company information
are not successful, we could incur substantial costs and reputational damage and could become subject to
litigation and enforcement actions.
Our business, like that of most retailers, involves the receipt, storage, management and transmission of customers’
personal information, preferences, and payment card information, as well as other confidential information, such as
personal information about our associates and our suppliers and confidential Company information. We also work with
third-party service providers and vendors that provide technology, systems and services that we use in connection with
the receipt, storage and transmission of this information. Our information systems, and those of our third-party service
providers and vendors, are vulnerable to an increasing threat of continually evolving data protection and cybersecurity
risks. Unauthorized parties have in the past gained access, and will continue to attempt to gain access to, these
systems and data through fraud or other means of deceiving our associates, third-party service providers or vendors.
Hardware, software or applications we develop or obtain from third parties may contain defects in design or
manufacture or other problems that could unexpectedly compromise information security. The methods used to obtain
unauthorized access, disable or degrade service, or sabotage systems are also constantly changing and evolving and
may be difficult to anticipate or detect for long periods of time. We have implemented and regularly review and update
our systems, processes, and procedures to protect against unauthorized access to or use of data and to prevent data
loss. However, the ever-evolving threats mean we and our third-party service providers and vendors must continually
evaluate and adapt our respective systems and processes and overall security environment, as well as those of any
companies we acquire. There is no guarantee that these measures will be adequate to safeguard against all data
security breaches, system compromises or misuses of data. As we experienced in connection with the data breach we
discovered in the third quarter of fiscal 2014, any significant compromise or breach of our data security, whether
external or internal, or misuse of customer, associate, supplier or Company data, could result in significant costs,
including costs to investigate and remediate, as well as lost sales, fines, lawsuits, and damage to our reputation.
In addition, the regulatory environment related to data privacy and cybersecurity is constantly changing, with new and
increasingly rigorous requirements applicable to our business. The implementation of these requirements has
11
Table of Contents
also become more complex. Maintaining our compliance with those requirements, including the California Consumer
Privacy Act (CCPA), may require significant effort and cost, require changes to our business practices, and limit our
ability to obtain data used to provide a personalized customer experience. In addition, failure to comply with applicable
requirements could subject us to fines, sanctions, governmental investigations, lawsuits or reputational damage.
We are subject to payment-related risks that could increase our operating costs, expose us to fraud or theft,
subject us to potential liability, and potentially disrupt our business.
We accept payments using a variety of methods, including cash, checks, credit and debit cards, PayPal, our PLCCs, an
installment loan program, trade credit, and gift cards, and we may offer new payment options over time. Acceptance of
these payment options subjects us to rules, regulations, contractual obligations and compliance requirements, including
payment network rules and operating guidelines, data security standards and certification requirements, and rules
governing electronic funds transfers. These requirements may change over time or be reinterpreted, making
compliance more difficult, costly, or uncertain. For certain payment methods, including credit and debit cards, we pay
interchange and other fees, which may increase over time and raise our operating costs. We rely on third parties to
provide payment processing services, including the processing of credit cards, debit cards, and other forms of
electronic payment. If these companies become unable to provide these services to us, or if their systems are
compromised, it could potentially disrupt our business. The payment methods that we offer also subject us to potential
fraud and theft by criminals, who are becoming increasingly more sophisticated, seeking to obtain unauthorized access
to or exploit weaknesses that may exist in our payments and payment processing systems. If we fail to comply with
applicable rules or requirements for the payment methods we accept, or if payment-related data is compromised due to
a breach or misuse of data, we may be liable for costs incurred by payment card issuing banks and other third parties
or subject to fines and higher transaction fees, or our ability to accept or facilitate certain types of payments may be
impaired. In addition, our customers could lose confidence in certain payment types, which may result in a shift to other
payment types or potential changes to our payment systems that may result in higher costs. As a result, our business
and operating results could be adversely affected.
Uncertainty regarding the housing market, economic conditions, political climate, public health issues, and
other factors beyond our control could adversely affect demand for our products and services, our costs of
doing business, and our financial performance.
Our financial performance depends significantly on the stability of the housing and home improvement markets, as well
as general economic conditions, including changes in gross domestic product. Adverse conditions in or uncertainty
about these markets, the economy or the political climate could adversely impact our customers’ confidence or financial
condition, causing them to decide against purchasing home improvement products and services, causing them to delay
purchasing decisions, or impacting their ability to pay for products and services. Other factors beyond our control –
including unemployment and foreclosure rates; inventory loss due to theft; interest rate fluctuations; fuel and other
energy costs; labor and healthcare costs; the availability of financing; the state of the credit markets, including
mortgages, home equity loans and consumer credit; weather; natural disasters; acts of terrorism or violence, including
active shooter situations; public health issues, including pandemics and quarantines; and other conditions beyond our
control – could further adversely affect demand for our products and services, our costs of doing business, and our
financial performance.
For example, the recent pandemic caused by the novel coronavirus COVID-19 has led to work and travel restrictions
within, to, and out of a number of countries and supply chain disruptions and delays. These restrictions and delays,
which may expand depending on the progression of the pandemic, have impacted and may continue to impact
suppliers and manufacturers of certain of our products. This may make it difficult for our suppliers to source and
manufacture products in, and to export our products from, affected areas. As a result, we have faced and may continue
to face delays or difficulty sourcing certain products, which could negatively affect our business and financial results.
Even if we are able to find alternate sources for such products, they may cost more, which could adversely impact our
profitability and financial condition. At this time, there is significant uncertainty relating to the potential effect of COVID-
19 on our business and the costs that we may incur as a result. Infections have become more widespread, which may
worsen the supply shortage or restrict third-party manufacturing or other operations. In response to the COVID-19
pandemic, we have canceled or shifted to virtual experiences for certain supplier and associate events and have shifted
certain store support operations to remote or virtual, and we may deem it appropriate or advisable to take further similar
actions in the future. We have shortened our customer-facing hours in all of our stores and temporarily closed our
stores in Puerto Rico, and we may need to restrict access to or close certain of, or face labor shortages in, other stores
or facilities, which could negatively impact productivity, sales, or operating expenses. We are taking steps in our stores
to manage foot traffic to better protect our customers and associates. We have also expanded our paid time off policy
to help alleviate some of the challenges our associates
12
Table of Contents
may be facing as a result of COVID-19, and we may face additional health insurance and labor-related costs. The
pandemic may also reduce foot traffic in our stores or temporarily reduce demand for our products or services. In
certain jurisdictions, we have had to cease sales of or delay commencement of certain services deemed “non-life-
sustaining,” and other jurisdictions may impose similar requirements. Further, customers’ financial condition may be
adversely impacted as a result of the impacts of COVID-19 and efforts taken to prevent its spread, which could result in
reduced demand for our products and services. In addition, our continued access to external sources of liquidity
depends on multiple factors, including the condition of debt capital markets, our operating performance, and
maintaining strong credit ratings. If the impacts of the pandemic create disruptions or turmoil in the financial markets, or
if rating agencies lower our credit ratings, it could adversely affect our ability to access the debt markets, our cost of
funds, and other terms for new debt. Any of these occurrences may have a negative impact on our business, financial
condition, results of operations, or cash flows.
Our business is subject to seasonal influences, and uncharacteristic or significant weather conditions, alone
or together with natural disasters, as well as other catastrophic events, could impact our operations.
Natural disasters, such as hurricanes and tropical storms, fires, floods, tornadoes, and earthquakes; unseasonable, or
unexpected or extreme weather conditions; acts of terrorism or violence, including active shooter situations; public
health concerns, such as pandemics and quarantines; or similar disruptions and catastrophic events can affect
consumer spending and confidence and consumers’ disposable income, particularly with respect to home improvement
or construction projects, and could have an adverse effect on our financial performance. These types of events can
also adversely affect our work force and prevent associates and customers from reaching our stores and other
facilities. They can also, temporarily or on a long-term basis, disrupt or disable operations of stores, support centers,
and portions of our supply chain and distribution network, including causing reductions in the availability of inventory
and disruption of utility services. In addition, these events may affect our information systems, resulting in disruption to
various aspects of our operations, including our ability to transact with customers and fulfill orders and to communicate
with our stores. Unseasonable, unexpected or extreme weather conditions such as excessive precipitation, warm
temperatures during the winter season, or prolonged or extreme periods of warm or cold temperatures could render a
portion of our inventory incompatible with customer needs. As a consequence of these or other catastrophic or
uncharacteristic events, we may experience interruption to our operations, increased costs, or losses of property,
equipment or inventory, which would adversely affect our revenue and profitability.
If we fail to identify and develop relationships with a sufficient number of qualified suppliers, or if our suppliers
experience financial difficulties or other challenges, our ability to timely and efficiently access products that
meet our high standards for quality could be adversely affected.
We buy our products from suppliers located throughout the world. Our ability to continue to identify and develop
relationships with qualified suppliers who can satisfy our high standards for quality and responsible sourcing, as well as
our need to access products in a timely and efficient manner, is a significant challenge. Our ability to access products
from our suppliers can be adversely affected by political instability, military conflict, acts of terrorism or violence, public
health issues (including pandemics and quarantines), the financial instability of suppliers, suppliers’ noncompliance with
applicable laws, trade restrictions, tariffs, currency exchange rates, any disruptions in our suppliers’ logistics or supply
chain networks or information technology systems, and other factors beyond our or our suppliers’ control. If we are
unable to access products to meet our customers’ demands and expectations in a timely and efficient manner, our
sales and gross margin results may be adversely impacted.
If we are unable to effectively manage and expand our alliances and relationships with selected suppliers of
both brand name and proprietary products, we may be unable to effectively execute our strategy to
differentiate ourselves from our competitors.
As part of our focus on product differentiation, we have formed strategic alliances and exclusive relationships with
selected suppliers to market products under a variety of well-recognized brand names. We have also developed
relationships with selected suppliers to allow us to market proprietary products that are comparable to national brands.
Our proprietary products differentiate us from other retailers, generally carry higher margins than national brand
products, and represent a growing portion of our business. If we are unable to manage and expand these alliances and
relationships or identify alternative sources for comparable brand name and proprietary products, we may not be able
to effectively execute product differentiation, which may impact our sales and gross margin results.
13
Table of Contents
Failure to achieve and maintain a high level of product and service quality and safety could damage our image
with customers, expose us to litigation, and negatively impact our sales and results of operations.
Product and service quality issues could negatively impact customer confidence in our brands and our Company. If our
product and service offerings do not meet applicable safety standards or our customers’ expectations regarding safety
or quality, we could experience lost sales and increased costs and be exposed to legal, financial and reputational risks,
as well as governmental enforcement actions. Actual, potential or perceived product safety concerns, including health-
related concerns, could expose us to litigation, as well as government enforcement actions, and result in costly product
recalls and other liabilities. We seek but may not be successful in obtaining contractual indemnification and insurance
coverage from our vendors. If we do not have adequate contractual indemnification or insurance available, such claims
could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Even with adequate
insurance and indemnification, our reputation as a provider of high quality products and services, including both
national brand names and our proprietary products, could suffer, damaging our reputation and impacting customer
loyalty. In addition, we and our customers have expectations around responsible sourcing. All of our vendors and
service providers must comply with our responsible sourcing standards, which cover a variety of expectations across
multiple areas of social compliance, including supply chain transparency, sources of supply, and child and forced labor.
We have a responsible sourcing audit process, but we are also dependent on our vendors and service providers to
ensure that the products and services we provide comply with our standards.
Our proprietary products subject us to certain increased risks, including regulatory, product liability, supplier
relations, and reputational risks.
As we expand our proprietary product offerings, in addition to other product-related risks discussed herein, we may
become subject to increased risks due to our greater role in the design, manufacture, marketing and sale of those
products. The risks include greater responsibility to administer and comply with applicable regulatory requirements,
increased potential product liability and product recall exposure, and increased potential reputational risks related to the
responsible sourcing of those products. To effectively execute on our product differentiation strategy, we must also be
able to successfully protect our proprietary rights and successfully navigate and avoid claims related to the proprietary
rights of third parties. In addition, an increase in sales of our proprietary products may adversely affect sales of our
suppliers’ products, which in turn could adversely affect our relationships with certain of our suppliers. Any failure to
appropriately address some or all of these risks could damage our reputation and have an adverse effect on our
business, results of operations, and financial condition.
If we are unable to effectively manage our installation services business, we could suffer lost sales and be
subject to fines, lawsuits and reputational damage, or the loss of our general contractor licenses.
We act as a general contractor to provide installation services to our DIFM customers through professional third-party
installers. As such, we are subject to regulatory requirements and risks applicable to general contractors, which include
management of licensing, permitting and quality of work performed by our third-party installers. We have established
processes and procedures to manage these requirements and ensure customer satisfaction with the services provided
by our third-party installers. However, if we fail to manage these processes effectively or to provide proper oversight of
these services, we could suffer lost sales, fines, lawsuits, and governmental enforcement actions for violations of
regulatory requirements, as well as for property damage or personal injury. In addition, we may suffer damage to our
reputation or the loss of our general contractor licenses, which could adversely affect our business.
Our strategic transactions involve risks, which could have an adverse impact on our financial condition and
results of operation, and we may not realize the anticipated benefits of these transactions.
We regularly consider and enter into strategic transactions, including mergers, acquisitions, investments, alliances, and
other growth and market expansion strategies, with the expectation that these transactions will result in increases in
sales, cost savings, synergies and various other benefits. Assessing the viability and realizing the benefits of these
transactions is subject to significant uncertainty. For each of our acquisitions, we need to successfully integrate the
target company’s products, services, associates and systems into our business operations. Integration can be a
complex and time-consuming process, and if the integration is not fully successful or is delayed for a material period of
time, we may not achieve the anticipated synergies or benefits of the acquisition. Furthermore, even if the target
companies are successfully integrated, the acquisitions may fail to further our business strategy as anticipated, expose
us to increased competition or challenges with respect to our products or services, and expose us to additional
liabilities. Any impairment of goodwill or other intangible assets acquired in a strategic transaction may reduce our
earnings.
14
Table of Contents
Our costs of doing business could increase as a result of changes in, expanded enforcement of, or adoption of
new federal, state or local laws and regulations.
We are subject to various federal, state and local laws and regulations that govern numerous aspects of our business.
In recent years, a number of new laws and regulations have been adopted, and there has been expanded enforcement
of certain existing laws and regulations by federal, state and local agencies. These laws and regulations, and related
interpretations and enforcement activity, may change as a result of a variety of factors, including political, economic or
social events. Changes in, expanded enforcement of, or adoption of new federal, state or local laws and regulations
governing minimum wage or living wage requirements; the classification of exempt and non-exempt employees; the
distinction between employees and contractors; other wage, labor or workplace regulations; healthcare; data privacy
and cybersecurity; the sale and pricing of some of our products; transportation; logistics; international trade; supply
chain transparency; taxes; unclaimed property; energy costs and consumption; or environmental matters, including with
respect to our installation services business, could increase our costs of doing business or impact our operations.
In fiscal 2017, Congress enacted the Tax Act, which significantly changed how the U.S. taxes corporations. During
fiscal 2018 and fiscal 2019, additional guidance related to the Tax Act was issued by the U.S. Department of the
Treasury and the IRS. The Tax Act requires complex computations to be performed that were not previously required
under U.S. tax law, significant judgments to be made in interpretation of the provisions of the Tax Act, significant
estimates in calculations, and the preparation and analysis of information not previously relevant or regularly produced.
The U.S. Department of the Treasury, the IRS, and other standard-setting bodies could interpret or issue guidance on
how provisions of the Tax Act will be applied or otherwise administered that is different from our interpretations. Further,
in addition to uncertainties that continue to exist in terms of how U.S. states will react to the Tax Act, recently enacted
changes in foreign countries within which we operate could have additional impacts on our effective tax rate.
If we cannot successfully manage the unique challenges presented by international markets, we may not be
successful in our international operations and our sales and profitability may be negatively impacted.
Our ability to successfully conduct retail operations in, and source products and materials from, international markets is
affected by many of the same risks we face in our U.S. operations, as well as unique costs and difficulties of managing
international operations. Our international operations, including any expansion in international markets, may be
adversely affected by local laws and customs, U.S. laws applicable to foreign operations and other foreign legal and
regulatory constraints, as well as political, social and economic conditions. Risks inherent in international operations
also include, among others, potential adverse tax consequences; international trade disputes, trade policy changes or
potential tariffs and other import-related taxes and controls; greater difficulty in enforcing intellectual property rights;
limitations on access to ports; risks associated with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and local anti-bribery law
compliance; and challenges in our ability to identify and gain access to local suppliers. For example, trade tensions
between the U.S. and China have led to a series of significant tariffs on the importation of certain product categories.
As a significant portion of our retail products are sourced, directly or indirectly, outside of the U.S., major changes in tax
or trade policies, tariffs or trade relations could adversely impact the cost of, demand for, and profitability of retail
product sales in our U.S. locations. Other countries may also change their business and trade policies in anticipation of
or in response to increased import tariffs and other changes in U.S. trade policy and regulations. In addition, our
operations in international markets create risk due to foreign currency exchange rates and fluctuations in those rates,
which may adversely impact our sales and profitability.
The inflation or deflation of commodity prices could affect our prices, demand for our products, our sales and
our profit margins.
Prices of certain commodity products, including lumber and other raw materials, are historically volatile and are subject
to fluctuations arising from changes in domestic and international supply and demand, labor costs, competition, market
speculation, government regulations, tariffs and trade restrictions, and periodic delays in delivery. Rapid and significant
changes in commodity prices may affect the demand for our products, our sales and our profit margins.
We may incur property, casualty or other losses not covered by our insurance.
We are predominantly self-insured for a number of different risk categories, such as general liability (including product
liability), workers’ compensation, employee group medical, automobile claims, and network security and privacy liability,
with insurance coverage for certain catastrophic risks. The types and amounts of insurance may vary from time to time
based on our decisions with respect to risk retention and regulatory requirements. The
15
Table of Contents
occurrence of significant claims, a substantial rise in costs to maintain our insurance, or the failure to maintain
adequate insurance coverage could have an adverse impact on our financial condition and results of operations.
Changes in accounting standards and subjective assumptions, estimates and judgments by management
related to complex accounting matters could significantly affect our financial results or financial condition.
GAAP and related accounting pronouncements, implementation guidelines and interpretations with regard to a wide
range of matters that are relevant to our business, such as asset impairment, inventories, lease obligations, self-
insurance, vendor allowances, tax matters and litigation, are complex and involve many subjective assumptions,
estimates and judgments. Changes in accounting standards or their interpretation or changes in underlying
assumptions, estimates or judgments could significantly change our reported or expected financial performance or
financial condition. The implementation of new accounting standards could also require certain systems, internal
process and other changes that could increase our operating costs.
We are involved in a number of legal, regulatory and governmental enforcement proceedings, and while we
cannot predict the outcomes of those proceedings and other contingencies with certainty, some of these
outcomes may adversely affect our operations or increase our costs.
We are involved in a number of legal proceedings and regulatory matters, including government inquiries and
investigations, and consumer, employment, tort and other litigation that arise from time to time in the ordinary course of
business. Litigation is inherently unpredictable, and the outcome of some of these proceedings and other contingencies
could require us to take or refrain from taking actions which could adversely affect our operations or could result in
excessive adverse verdicts or results. Additionally, involvement in these lawsuits, investigations and inquiries, and other
proceedings may involve significant expense, divert management’s attention and resources from other matters, and
impact the reputation of the Company.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments.
Not applicable.
16
Table of Contents
Item 2. Properties.
The percentage of our owned versus leased facilities that were operating at the end of fiscal 2019, along with the total
square footage, follows:
square footage in millions Owned LeasedTotal Square
Footage
Stores (1)90% 10% 238.1
Warehouses and distribution centers 4% 96% 60.0
Offices and other 23% 77% 4.4
Total 302.5
—————
(1)Our owned stores include those subject to ground leases.
Our U.S. store locations at the end of fiscal 2019 follow:
U.S. Stores U.S. Stores
Alabama 28 Montana 6
Alaska 7 Nebraska 8
Arizona 56 Nevada 21
Arkansas 14 New Hampshire 20
California 232 New Jersey 67
Colorado 46 New Mexico 13
Connecticut 30 New York 100
Delaware 9 North Carolina 40
District of Columbia 1 North Dakota 2
Florida 155 Ohio 70
Georgia 90 Oklahoma 16
Guam 1 Oregon 27
Hawaii 7 Pennsylvania 70
Idaho 11 Puerto Rico 9
Illinois 76 Rhode Island 8
Indiana 24 South Carolina 26
Iowa 10 South Dakota 1
Kansas 16 Tennessee 39
Kentucky 14 Texas 179
Louisiana 28 Utah 22
Maine 11 Vermont 3
Maryland 41 Virgin Islands 2
Massachusetts 45 Virginia 49
Michigan 70 Washington 45
Minnesota 33 West Virginia 6
Mississippi 14 Wisconsin 27
Missouri 34 Wyoming 5
  Total U.S. 1,984
17
Table of Contents
Our store locations outside of the U.S. at the end of fiscal 2019 follow:
Canada Stores Mexico Stores
Alberta 27 Aguascalientes 2
British Columbia 26 Baja California 6
Manitoba 6 Baja California Sur 2
New Brunswick 3 Campeche 2
Newfoundland 1 Chiapas 2
Nova Scotia 4 Chihuahua 5
Ontario 88 Coahuila 5
Prince Edward Island 1 Colima 2
Quebec 22 Distrito Federal 10
Saskatchewan 4 Durango 1
Total Canada 182 Guanajuato 5
  Guerrero 2
  Hidalgo 1
  Jalisco 7
  Michoacán 4
  Morelos 3
  Nayarit 1
  Nuevo León 10
  Oaxaca 1
  Puebla 5
  Querétaro 4
  Quintana Roo 3
  San Luis Potosí 2
  Sinaloa 5
  Sonora 4
  State of Mexico 16
  Tabasco 1
  Tamaulipas 5
  Tlaxcala 1
  Veracruz 5
  Yucatán 2
  Zacatecas 1
  Total Mexico 125
Item 3. Legal Proceedings.
SEC regulations require us to disclose certain information about proceedings arising under federal, state or local
environmental regulations if we reasonably believe that such proceedings may result in monetary sanctions of
$100,000 or more.
As previously reported, in January 2017, we became aware of an investigation by the EPA’s criminal investigation
division into our compliance with lead-safe work practices for certain jobs performed through our installation services
business. We have also previously responded to civil document requests from several EPA regions. In the second
quarter of fiscal 2018, we received a subpoena for documents from the EPA civil enforcement division. In the second
quarter of fiscal 2019, we received a grand jury subpoena from the U.S. Attorney for the Northern District of Georgia
and an amendment of the subpoena from the EPA civil enforcement division. We are continuing to cooperate and
engage in discussions with the EPA and the Department of Justice on these matters.
18
Table of Contents
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures.
Not applicable.
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities.
Since April 19, 1984, our common stock has been listed on the NYSE, trading under the symbol “HD.” We paid our first
cash dividend on June 22, 1987 and have paid a cash dividend during each subsequent quarter. While we currently
expect a cash dividend to be paid in the future, future dividend payments will depend on our earnings, capital
requirements, financial condition, and other factors considered relevant by our Board of Directors.
At March 6, 2020, there were approximately 121,000 holders of record of our common stock and approximately
3,043,000 additional “street name” holders whose shares are held of record by banks, brokers, and other financial
institutions.
Stock Performance Graph
The graph and table below present our cumulative total shareholder returns relative to the performance of the S&P
Retail Composite Index and the S&P 500 Index for the five most recent fiscal years. The graph assumes $100 was
invested at the closing price of our common stock on the NYSE and in each index on the last trading day of fiscal 2014
and assumes that all dividends were reinvested on the date paid. The points on the graph represent fiscal year-end
amounts based on the last trading day in each fiscal year.
—●—The Home Depot —u—S&P Retail Composite Index —■—S&P 500 Index
 Fiscal Year Ended
 February 1,
2015  January 31,
2016January 29,
2017  January 28,
2018February 3,
2019February 2,
2020
The Home Depot $ 100.00 $ 122.88$ 138.04 $ 211.56$ 192.43$ 244.53
S&P Retail Composite Index 100.00 116.80 138.46 201.09 211.74 255.38
S&P 500 Index 100.00 99.33 120.04 153.29 147.35 179.10
19
Table of Contents
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The number and average price of shares purchased in each fiscal month of the fourth quarter of fiscal 2019 follow:
PeriodTotal Number
of
Shares
Purchased(1)Average Price
Paid
Per Share(1) Total Number of Shares
Purchased 
as Part of Publicly
Announced Program(2) Dollar Value of Shares
that May Yet
Be Purchased 
Under the Program(2)
November 4, 2019 – December 1, 2019 594,467(3) $ 227.52 589,932 $11,486,268,617
December 2, 2019 – December 29, 2019 4,488,532 218.35 4,487,586 10,312,547,946
December 30, 2019 – February 2, 2020 9,854,407 226.26 9,852,099 8,277,265,927
Total 14,937,406 223.93 14,929,617  
—————
(1)These amounts include repurchases pursuant to our Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan and our 1997 Omnibus Stock
Incentive Plan (collectively, the “Plans”). Under the Plans, participants may surrender shares as payment of applicable tax withholding on the
vesting of restricted stock and deferred share awards. Participants in the Plans may also exercise stock options by surrendering shares of
common stock that the participants already own as payment of the exercise price. Shares so surrendered by participants in the Plans are
repurchased pursuant to the terms of the Plans and applicable award agreement and not pursuant to publicly announced share repurchase
programs.
(2)In February 2019, our Board of Directors authorized a $15.0 billion share repurchase program that replaced the previous authorization. This
program does not have a prescribed expiration date.
(3)This amount includes shares received in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2019 related to the settlement of the ASR agreement entered into in the third
quarter of fiscal 2019. See Note 6 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our ASR agreements.
Sales of Unregistered Securities
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2019, we issued 462 deferred stock units under the Home Depot, Inc. Nonemployee
Directors’ Deferred Stock Compensation Plan pursuant to the exemption from registration provided by Section 4(a)(2)
of the Securities Act and Rule 506 of the SEC’s Regulation D thereunder. The deferred stock units were credited to the
accounts of those non-employee directors who elected to receive all or a portion of board retainers in the form of
deferred stock units instead of cash during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2019. The deferred stock units convert to shares
of common stock on a one-for-one basis following a termination of service as described in this plan.
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2019, we credited 9,193 deferred stock units to participant accounts under the
Restoration Plan pursuant to an exemption from the registration requirements of the Securities Act for involuntary, non-
contributory plans. The deferred stock units convert to shares of common stock on a one-for-one basis following a
termination of service as described in this plan.
Item 6. Selected Financial Data.
The information required by this item is incorporated by reference to page F-1 of this report.
20
Table of Contents
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.
Our MD&A includes the following sections:
•Executive Summary
•Results of Operations and Non-GAAP Measures
•Liquidity and Capital Resources
•Critical Accounting Policies
Executive Summary
Highlights of our annual financial performance follow:
dollars in millions, except per share dataFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
Net sales $ 110,225$ 108,203 $ 100,904
Net earnings 11,242 11,121 8,630
   
Diluted earnings per share $ 10.25$ 9.73 $ 7.29
   
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 13,723$ 13,038 $ 12,031
Proceeds from long-term debt, net of discounts and premiums 3,420 3,466 2,991
Repayments of long-term debt 1,070 1,209 543
Repurchases of common stock 6,965 9,963 8,000
—————
Note: Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
We reported net sales of $110.2 billion in fiscal 2019. Net earnings were $11.2 billion, or $10.25 per diluted share. We
opened one net new store in Mexico and three net new stores in the U.S. during fiscal 2019, for a total store count of
2,291 at February 2, 2020. At the end of fiscal 2019, a total of 307 of our stores, or 13.4%, were located in Canada and
Mexico. Total sales per retail square foot were $454.82 in fiscal 2019, and our inventory turnover ratio was 4.9 times at
the end of fiscal 2019.
We generated $13.7 billion of cash flow from operations during fiscal 2019 and issued $3.4 billion of long-term debt, net
of discounts and premiums. These funds, together with cash on hand, were used to pay $6.0 billion of dividends, fund
cash payments of $7.0 billion for share repurchases, repay $365 million of net short-term borrowings, fund $2.7 billion
in capital expenditures, and repay $1.0 billion of senior notes that matured in June 2019.
During fiscal 2019, we repurchased $7.0 billion of our common stock through open market transactions and an ASR
agreement. In February 2020, we announced a 10% increase in our quarterly cash dividend to $1.50 per share.
Our ROIC was 45.4% for fiscal 2019. See the “Non-GAAP Financial Measures” section below for our definition and
calculation of ROIC, as well as a reconciliation of NOPAT, a non-GAAP financial measure, to net earnings (the most
comparable GAAP financial measure).
The recent outbreak of the novel coronavirus COVID-19, which was declared a pandemic by the World Health
Organization on March 11, 2020, has led to adverse impacts on the U.S. and global economies and created uncertainty
regarding potential impacts to our supply chain, operations, and customer demand. The pandemic has impacted and
could further impact our operations and the operations of our suppliers and vendors as a result of quarantines, facility
closures, and travel and logistics restrictions. As a result of COVID-19, we have reduced store operating hours,
expanded our paid time off policy for associates, and shifted certain store support operations to remote or virtual, and
we may face additional labor-related costs. We are also taking steps in our stores to manage foot traffic to better
protect our customers and associates. In addition, in certain jurisdictions, we have had to cease sales of or delay
commencement of work on certain services deemed “non-life-sustaining.”
We continue to actively monitor the situation and may take further actions that alter our operations as may be required
by federal, state or local authorities or that we determine are in the best interests of our associates, customers,
suppliers, vendors and shareholders. While the disruption is currently expected to be temporary, there is
21
Table of Contents
uncertainty regarding its duration. Therefore, while we expect the pandemic to impact our business, results of
operations, financial position, and liquidity, we cannot reasonably estimate the impact at this time.
Results of Operations and Non-GAAP Measures
The tables and discussion below should be read in conjunction with our consolidated financial statements and related
notes included in this report. The following table displays the percentage relationship between net sales and major
categories in our consolidated statements of earnings, as well as the percentage change in the associated dollar
amounts:
 Fiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
dollars in millions $  % of Net
Sales  $% of Net
Sales  $% of Net
Sales
Net sales $110,225   $108,203  $100,904 
Gross profit 37,572 34.1 % 37,160 34.3 % 34,356 34.0 %
Operating expenses:         
Selling, general and
administrative 19,740 17.9  19,513 18.0  17,864 17.7
Depreciation and amortization 1,989 1.8  1,870 1.7  1,811 1.8
Impairment loss — —  247 0.2  — —
Total operating expenses 21,729 19.7  21,630 20.0  19,675 19.5
Operating income 15,843 14.4  15,530 14.4  14,681 14.5
Interest and other (income) expense:         
Interest and investment income (73) (0.1) (93) (0.1) (74) (0.1)
Interest expense 1,201 1.1  1,051 1.0  1,057 1.0
Other — —  16 —  — —
Interest and other, net 1,128 1.0  974 0.9  983 1.0
Earnings before provision for income
taxes 14,715 13.3  14,556 13.5  13,698 13.6
Provision for income taxes 3,473 3.2  3,435 3.2  5,068 5.0
Net earnings $11,242 10.2 % $11,121 10.3 % $ 8,630 8.6 %
—————
Note: Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks. Certain percentages may not sum to totals due to rounding. 
22
Table of Contents
  % Change
Selected financial and sales data:Fiscal  Fiscal Fiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018 2017  2019 vs. 2018 2018 vs. 2017
Comparable sales increase (1) (2)3.5% 5.2% 6.8% N/A  N/A
Comparable customer transactions increase
(1) (3) 1.1% 1.0% 2.2% N/A  N/A
Comparable average ticket increase (1) (3)2.5% 4.2% 4.5% N/A  N/A
Customer transactions (in millions) (3) (4)1,616.0 1,620.8 1,578.6 (0.3)% 2.7%
Average ticket (3) (4) (5)$ 67.30 $ 65.74 $ 63.06 2.4 % 4.2%
Sales per retail square foot (3) (4) (6)$454.82 $446.86 $417.02 1.8 % 7.2%
Diluted earnings per share $ 10.25 $ 9.73 $ 7.29 5.3 % 33.5%
—————
(1)Fiscal 2019 compares the 52 week period in fiscal 2019 to weeks 2 through 53 in fiscal 2018. Fiscal 2018 calculations do not include results
from the 53rd week of fiscal 2018 and compare weeks 1 through 52 in fiscal 2018 to the 52 week period in fiscal 2017.
(2)Comparable sales for fiscal 2017 do not include results for Interline.
(3)The calculations do not include results for Interline.
(4)The 53rd week of fiscal 2018 increased customer transactions by 24.5 million, added $0.01 to average ticket, and increased sales per retail
square foot by $6.87.
(5)Average ticket represents the average price paid per transaction and is used by management to monitor the performance of the Company, as it
represents a primary driver in measuring sales performance.
(6)Sales per retail square foot represents sales divided by the retail store square footage. Sales per retail square foot is a measure of the efficiency
of sales based on the total square footage of our stores and is used by management to monitor the performance of the Company as an indicator
of the productivity of owned and leased square footage for retail operations.
Fiscal 2019 Compared to Fiscal 2018
Sales. We assess our sales performance by evaluating both net sales and comparable sales.
Net Sales. Fiscal 2019 consisted of 52 weeks compared to 53 weeks in fiscal 2018. Net sales for fiscal 2019 increased
$2.0 billion, or 1.9%, to $110.2 billion. The increase in net sales in fiscal 2019 primarily reflected the impact of positive
comparable sales driven by an increase in comparable average ticket growth and comparable customer transactions,
offset by $1.7 billion of net sales attributable to the additional week in fiscal 2018. Online sales, which consist of sales
generated online through our websites for products picked up in our stores or delivered to customer locations,
represented 9.3% of net sales and grew 19.4% during fiscal 2019.
Comparable Sales. Comparable sales is a measure that highlights the performance of our existing locations and
websites by measuring the change in net sales for a period over the comparable prior-period of equivalent length.
Comparable sales includes sales at all locations, physical and online, open greater than 52 weeks (including remodels
and relocations) and excludes closed stores. Retail stores become comparable on the Monday following their 52nd
week of operation. Acquisitions, digital or otherwise, are included in comparable sales after they have been owned for
more than 52 weeks. Our comparable sales results for fiscal 2019 compare the 52-week period reported for fiscal 2019
to weeks 2 through 53 in fiscal 2018. Comparable sales is intended only as supplemental information and is not a
substitute for net sales presented in accordance with GAAP.
Total comparable sales increased 3.5% in fiscal 2019. The increase in comparable sales reflected a number of factors,
including traffic growth across a number of our core categories and the execution of our strategic efforts to drive an
enhanced interconnected experience in both the physical and digital worlds. All of our merchandising departments
posted positive comparable sales in fiscal 2019 except for Lumber, which was negative primarily due to commodity
price deflation. For fiscal 2019, comparable sales for our Appliances, Indoor Garden, Décor/Storage, Tools, Hardware,
and Outdoor Garden merchandising departments were above the Company average. Our comparable average ticket
increased 2.5% in fiscal 2019 while comparable customer transactions increased 1.1% during fiscal 2019. The increase
in comparable average ticket was due in large part to strong sales in big ticket purchases in certain categories, such as
appliances and vinyl plank flooring.
Gross Profit. Gross profit increased $412 million, or 1.1%, to $37.6 billion in fiscal 2019. Gross profit as a percent of
net sales, or gross profit margin, was 34.1% in fiscal 2019 compared to 34.3% in fiscal 2018. The decrease in gross
profit margin for fiscal 2019 was primarily driven by higher shrink and changes in product mix.
Operating Expenses. Our operating expenses are composed of SG&A, depreciation and amortization, and impairment
loss.
Selling, General & Administrative. SG&A increased $227 million, or 1.2%, to $19.7 billion in fiscal 2019. As a percent of
net sales, SG&A was 17.9% for fiscal 2019 compared to 18.0% for fiscal 2018. The decrease in SG&A as
23
Table of Contents
a percent of net sales for fiscal 2019 was primarily driven by expense leverage resulting from positive comparable sales
and continued expense control, partially offset by expenses related to strategic investments in the business.
Depreciation and Amortization. Depreciation and amortization increased $119 million, or 6.4%, in fiscal 2019. As a
percent of net sales, depreciation and amortization was 1.8% for fiscal 2019 compared to 1.7% in fiscal 2018. The
increase in depreciation and amortization as a percent of net sales reflects incremental depreciation stemming from
investments in the business, partially offset by leverage resulting from positive comparable sales and timing of asset
additions. The additional week in fiscal 2018 did not result in incremental expense because we recognize depreciation
and amortization expense on a monthly basis.
Impairment Loss. There were no material impairment losses recognized in fiscal 2019. We recognized a $247 million
impairment loss in fiscal 2018 related to certain trade names associated with Interline. See Note 1 to our consolidated
financial statements for further discussion.
Interest and Other, net. Interest and other, net, was $1.1 billion for fiscal 2019 compared to $974 million for
fiscal 2018. Interest and other, net, as a percent of net sales increased to 1.0% in fiscal 2019 from 0.9% in fiscal 2018,
primarily due to higher interest expense resulting from higher debt balances in fiscal 2019.
Provision for Income Taxes. Our combined effective income tax rate was 23.6% for both fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018.
The provision for income taxes in fiscal 2019 reflects a benefit from stock-based compensation and other discrete tax
items. The effective income tax rate for fiscal 2018 primarily reflected the enactment of the Tax Act. See Note 5 to our
consolidated financial statements for further discussion.
Diluted Earnings per Share. Diluted earnings per share were $10.25 for fiscal 2019 compared to $9.73 for fiscal 2018.
Diluted earnings per share for fiscal 2019 reflected a tax-related benefit of $0.17 per share resulting from stock-based
compensation and other discrete tax items.
Diluted earnings per share for fiscal 2018 reflected a benefit of $1.48 per share resulting from the enactment of the Tax
Act, a benefit of $0.21 per share for the 53rd week, and a decrease of $0.16 per share due to the impairment loss
related to certain trade names associated with Interline.
Fiscal 2018 Compared to Fiscal 2017
For a comparison of our results of operations for fiscal 2018 to fiscal 2017, see “Part II, Item 7. Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of our Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
February 3, 2019, filed with the SEC on March 28, 2019.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
To provide clarity about our operating performance, we supplement our reporting with certain non-GAAP financial
measures. However, this supplemental information should not be considered in isolation or as a substitute for the
related GAAP measures. Non-GAAP financial measures presented herein may differ from similar measures used by
other companies.
Return on Invested Capital. We believe ROIC is meaningful for investors and management because it measures how
effectively we deploy our capital base. We define ROIC as NOPAT, a non-GAAP financial measure, for the most recent
twelve-month period, divided by average debt and equity. We define average debt and equity as the average of
beginning and ending long-term debt (including current installments) and equity for the most recent twelve-month
period.
The calculation of ROIC, together with a reconciliation of NOPAT to net earnings (the most comparable GAAP
measure), follows:
 Fiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
dollars in millions 2019 2018  2017
Net earnings $ 11,242 $ 11,121 $ 8,630
Interest and other, net 1,128 974 983
Provision for income taxes 3,473 3,435 5,068
Operating income 15,843 15,530 14,681
Income tax adjustment (1)(3,739) (3,665) (5,432)
NOPAT $ 12,104 $ 11,865 $ 9,249
   
Average debt and equity (2)$ 26,686 $ 26,492 $ 27,074
   
ROIC 45.4% 44.8% 34.2%
—————
Note: Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
(1)Income tax adjustment is defined as operating income multiplied by our effective tax rate for the trailing twelve months.
(2)The beginning balance of equity for fiscal 2019 has been adjusted to reflect an immaterial opening balance sheet adjustment due to the
adoption of ASU No. 2016-02, Leases, in fiscal 2019.The beginning balance of equity for fiscal 2018 has been adjusted to reflect an opening
balance sheet adjustment of $75 million due to the adoption of ASU No. 2014-09, Revenue from Contracts with Customers, in fiscal 2018.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Cash and Cash Equivalents at End of Year
At February 2, 2020, we had $2.1 billion in cash and cash equivalents, of which $1.8 billion was held by our foreign
subsidiaries. We believe that our current cash position, cash flow generated from operations, funds available from our
commercial paper programs, and access to the long-term debt capital markets should be sufficient for our operating
requirements and to enable us to fund our capital expenditures, dividend payments, and any required long-term debt
payments through the next several fiscal years. In addition, we believe we have the ability to obtain alternative sources
of financing. We expect capital expenditures of approximately $2.8 billion in fiscal 2020. Given the current uncertainty
related to the COVID-19 pandemic, we may adjust our capital expenditures as necessary or appropriate to support the
operations of the business.
Debt and Derivatives
At February 2, 2020, we had commercial paper programs with an aggregate borrowing capacity of $3.0 billion. All of our
short-term borrowings in fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018 were under these commercial paper programs. In connection with
these programs, we have back-up credit facilities with a consortium of banks for borrowings up to $3.0 billion, which
consist of a five-year $2.0 billion credit facility, which expires in December 2022, and a 364-day
24
Table of Contents
$1.0 billion credit facility. In December 2019, we completed the renewal of our 364-day $1.0 billion credit facility,
extending the maturity from December 2019 to December 2020. At February 2, 2020, we were in compliance with all of
the covenants contained in the credit facilities, none of which are expected to impact our liquidity or capital resources.
At February 2, 2020, there were $974 million of borrowings outstanding under these commercial paper programs
compared to $1.3 billion at February 3, 2019.
In March 2020, we expanded our commercial paper programs from $3.0 billion to $6.0 billion. We also entered into an
additional 364-day $3.5 billion credit facility in March 2020, which together with the two credit facilities mentioned above
backs up our expanded commercial paper programs. We may enter into additional credit facilities or other debt
financing.
We also issue senior notes from time to time and use derivative financial instruments in the management of our
exposure to fluctuations in foreign currencies and interest rates on certain long-term debt. See Note 4 and Note 7 to our
consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our debt and derivative agreements.
Leases
We use operating and finance leases to fund a portion of our real estate, including our stores, distribution centers, and
store support centers. See Note 3 to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our operating and
finance leases.
Share Repurchases
In February 2019, our Board of Directors authorized a new $15.0 billion share repurchase program, of which
approximately $8.3 billion remained at the end of fiscal 2019. During fiscal 2019, we had cash payments of $7.0 billion
for repurchases of our common stock through open market purchases and an ASR agreement. See Note 6 to our
consolidated financial statements for further discussion of our share repurchases. In March 2020, we suspended our
share repurchases until such time as we deem appropriate.
Cash Flows Summary
Operating Activities. Cash flow generated from operations provides us with a significant source of liquidity. Our
operating cash flows result primarily from cash received from our customers, offset by cash payments we make for
products and services, employee compensation, operations, and occupancy costs.
Cash provided by or used in operating activities is also subject to changes in working capital. Working capital at any
specific point in time is subject to many variables, including seasonality, inventory management and category
expansion, the timing of cash receipts and payments, vendor payment terms, and fluctuations in foreign exchange
rates.
Net cash provided by operating activities in fiscal 2019 was $13.7 billion driven primarily by net earnings of $11.2 billion
and non-cash adjustments to net earnings of $2.7 billion, consisting of depreciation and amortization, stock-
25
Table of Contents
based compensation expense and changes in deferred income taxes, offset by working capital outflows driven primarily
by timing of inventory purchases and collection of receivables.
Net cash provided by operating activities in fiscal 2018 was $13.0 billion driven primarily by net earnings of $11.1 billion
and non-cash adjustments to net earnings of $2.7 billion, consisting of depreciation and amortization, stock-based
compensation, impairment loss and changes in deferred income taxes, partially offset by net cash outflows associated
with changes in working capital driven primarily by timing of inventory purchases.
Investing Activities. Cash used in investing activities primarily reflected $2.7 billion and $2.4 billion of capital
expenditures for investments in our business in fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018, respectively.
Financing Activities. Cash used in financing activities in fiscal 2019 primarily reflected $7.0 billion of share
repurchases and $6.0 billion of cash dividends paid, partially offset by $2.0 billion of net proceeds from short- and long-
term debt.
Cash used in financing activities in fiscal 2018 primarily reflected $10.0 billion of share repurchases and $4.7 billion of
cash dividends paid, partially offset by $2.0 billion of net proceeds from short- and long-term debt.
Contractual Obligations
Our significant contractual obligations at February 2, 2020 were as follows:
 Payments Due by Period
in millions Total  Less than
1 Year1 to
3 Years3 to
5 YearsMore Than
5 Years
Short-term debt $ 974 $ 974$ — $ — $ —
Long-term debt – principal payments (1)29,500 1,750 4,600 2,100 21,050
Long-term debt – interest payments (2)17,709 1,083 1,951 1,775 12,900
Finance lease obligations (3)1,773 172 341 312 948
Operating lease obligations (3)6,680 955 1,647 1,256 2,822
Purchase obligations (4)1,400 971 336 87 6
Unrecognized tax benefits (5)25 25 — — —
Total $58,061 $ 5,930$ 8,875$ 5,530$37,726
—————
(1)Excludes finance lease obligations.
(2)Interest payments are calculated at current interest rates, including the impact of active interest rate swaps.
(3)Includes finance and operating lease imputed interest of $608 million and $786 million, respectively.
(4)Purchase obligations include all legally binding contracts such as firm commitments for inventory purchases, utility purchases, capital
expenditures, software acquisitions and license commitments, and legally binding service contracts. Purchase orders that are not binding
agreements are excluded from the table above.
(5)Excludes $448 million of noncurrent unrecognized tax benefits due to uncertainty regarding the timing of future cash tax payments.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We have no material off-balance sheet arrangements.
Critical Accounting Policies
Our significant accounting policies are disclosed in Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements. The following
discussion addresses our most critical accounting policies, which are those that are both important to the
26
Table of Contents
representation of our financial condition and results of operations, and that require significant judgment or use of
significant assumptions or complex estimates.
Merchandise Inventories
We value the substantial majority of our inventory under the retail inventory method, using the first-in, first-out method,
with the remainder of our inventories valued under a cost method. Under the retail inventory method, inventories are
stated at cost, which is determined by applying a cost-to-retail ratio to the retail value of inventories.
The retail value of our inventory is adjusted as needed to reflect current market conditions. Because these adjustments
are based on current prevailing market conditions, the value of our inventory approximates the lower of cost or market.
The valuation under the retail inventory method is based on a number of factors such as markups, markdowns, and
inventory losses (or shrink). As such, there exists an inherent uncertainty in the final determination of inventory cost and
gross profit. We determine markups and markdowns based on the consideration of a variety of factors such as current
and anticipated demand, customer preferences and buying trends, age of the merchandise, and weather conditions.
We calculate shrink based on actual inventory losses determined as a result of physical inventory counts during each
fiscal period and estimated inventory losses which occur between physical inventory counts. The estimate for shrink in
the interim period between physical inventory counts is calculated on a store-specific basis based on recent shrink
results and current trends in the business. Historically, the difference between estimated shrink and actual inventory
losses has not been material to our annual financial results.
We do not believe there is a reasonable likelihood for a material change in the estimates or assumptions we use to
value our inventory under the retail inventory method. We believe that the retail inventory method provides an inventory
valuation which approximates cost and results in valuing our inventory at the lower of cost or market.
Impairment of Long-Lived Assets
We evaluate our long-lived assets each quarter for indicators of potential impairment. Indicators of impairment include
current period losses combined with a history of losses, our decision to relocate or close a store or other location before
the end of its previously estimated useful life, or when changes in other circumstances indicate the carrying amount of
an asset may not be recoverable. The evaluation for long-lived assets is performed at the lowest level of identifiable
cash flows, which is generally the individual store level. The assets of a store with indicators of impairment are
evaluated for recoverability by comparing their undiscounted future cash flows with their carrying value. Our cash flow
projections look several years into the future and include assumptions of variables such as future sales and operating
margin growth rates, economic conditions, market competition, and inflation.
If the carrying value is greater than the undiscounted future cash flows, we then measure the asset’s fair value to
determine whether an impairment loss should be recognized. If the resulting fair value is less than the carrying value,
an impairment loss is recognized. We generally base our estimates of fair market value on market appraisals of owned
locations and estimates of the amount of potential sublease income and the time required to sublease for leased
locations. Impairments and lease obligation costs on closings and relocations were not material to our consolidated
financial statements in fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018 or fiscal 2017.
Self-Insurance
We have established liabilities for certain losses related to general liability (including product liability), workers’
compensation, employee group medical, and automobile claims for which we are self-insured. Our self-insured
retention or deductible, as applicable, for each claim involving general liability, workers’ compensation, and automobile
liability is limited to $25 million, $1 million, and $1 million, respectively. We have no stop loss limits for self-insured
employee group medical claims. Our liabilities represent estimates of the ultimate cost for claims incurred at the
balance sheet date. The estimated liabilities are not discounted and are established based upon analysis of historical
data and actuarial estimates. The liabilities are reviewed by management and third-party actuaries to ensure that they
are appropriate. While we believe these estimates are reasonable based on the information currently available, if actual
trends, including the severity or frequency of claims, medical cost inflation or fluctuations in premiums, differ from our
estimates, our results of operations could be impacted. Actual results related to these types of claims did not vary
materially from estimated amounts for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018 or fiscal 2017.
Vendor Allowances
Vendor allowances primarily consist of volume rebates that are earned as a result of attaining certain purchase levels
and co-op advertising allowances for the promotion of vendors’ products that are typically based on
27
Table of Contents
guaranteed minimum amounts with additional amounts being earned for attaining certain purchase levels. These
vendor allowances are accrued as earned, with those allowances received as a result of attaining certain purchase
levels accrued over the incentive period based on estimates of purchases. We believe that our estimate of vendor
allowances earned based on expected volume of purchases over the incentive period is an accurate reflection of the
ultimate allowance to be received from our vendors.
Volume rebates and certain co-op advertising allowances reduce the carrying cost of inventory and are recognized in
cost of sales when the related inventory is sold. Certain other co-op advertising allowances that are reimbursements of
specific, incremental and identifiable costs incurred to promote vendors’ products are recorded as an offset against
advertising expense in SG&A.
Uncertain Tax Positions
We are subject to income taxes in the United States and in multiple jurisdictions across our global operations. Thus, the
determination of our provision for income taxes requires significant judgment, the use of estimates, and the
interpretations and application of complex tax law. Our provision for income taxes could be affected by many factors,
including changes in business operations, changes in tax law, outcomes of income tax audits, changes in our
assessment of certain tax contingencies, the impact of discrete tax items and the mix of earnings among our U.S. and
foreign operations.
The calculation of our tax liabilities involves dealing with complexity and thus, there are many transactions and
calculations for which the ultimate tax determination is uncertain. The assessment of uncertain tax positions requires
the use of significant judgment in evaluating our tax positions and assessing the timing and amounts of deductible and
taxable items. We record the benefits of uncertain tax positions in our financial statements only after determining a
more likely than not probability that the uncertain tax positions will be sustained.
Additional Information
For information on accounting pronouncements that have impacted or are expected to materially impact our financial
condition, results of operations, or cash flows, see Note 1 to our consolidated financial statements.
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk.
Interest Rate Risk. We have exposure to interest rate risk in connection with our long-term debt portfolio. We use
interest rate swap agreements to manage our fixed/floating rate debt portfolio. At February 2, 2020, after giving
consideration to our interest rate swap agreements, floating rate debt principal was $2.9 billion, or approximately 10%
of our long-term debt portfolio. A 1.0 percentage point change in the interest costs of floating-rate debt would not have a
material impact on our financial condition or results of operations.
The United Kingdom’s Financial Conduct Authority has announced the intent to phase out the use of LIBOR by the end
of 2021. When LIBOR is discontinued, we may need to renegotiate the terms of certain of our floating rate notes,
interest rate swap agreements, and credit instruments which utilize LIBOR as a benchmark in determining the interest
rate, to replace LIBOR with the new standard that is established. As a result, we may incur incremental costs in
transitioning to a new standard, and interest rates on our current or future indebtedness may be adversely affected by
the new standard. Decisions have not been finalized regarding the future utilization of LIBOR or any particular
replacement rate. As such, the potential effect of any such event on our cost of capital cannot yet be determined, but
we do not expect it to have a material impact on our consolidated financial condition, results of operations, or cash
flows.
Foreign Currency Exchange Rate Risk. We are exposed to risks from foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations on
the translation of our foreign operations into U.S. dollars and on the purchase of goods by these foreign operations that
are not denominated in their local currencies. Revenues from these foreign operations accounted for approximately
$8.9 billion of our revenue for fiscal 2019. Our exposure to foreign currency rate fluctuations is not material to our
financial condition or results of operations.
Commodity Price Risk. We experience inflation and deflation related to our purchase of certain commodity products.
This price volatility could potentially have a material impact on our financial condition and/or our results of operations. In
order to mitigate price volatility, we monitor commodity price fluctuations and may adjust our selling prices accordingly;
however, our ability to recover higher costs through increased pricing may be limited by the competitive environment in
which we operate. We currently do not use derivative instruments to manage these risks.
28
Table of Contents
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data.
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 30
Consolidated Balance Sheets 32
Consolidated Statements of Earnings 33
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 34
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity 35
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 36
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 37
Note 1. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies 37
Note 2. Net Sales and Segment Reporting 43
Note 3. Property and Leases 45
Note 4. Debt and Derivative Instruments 48
Note 5. Income Taxes 51
Note 6. Stockholders' Equity 55
Note 7. Fair Value Measurements 55
Note 8. Stock-Based Compensation 56
Note 9. Employee Benefit Plans 59
Note 10. Weighted Average Common Shares 59
Note 11. Commitments and Contingencies 59
Note 12. Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited) 60
Note 13. Subsequent Events 60
29
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
The Home Depot, Inc.:
Opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying Consolidated Balance Sheets of The Home Depot, Inc. and Subsidiaries (the
Company) as of February 2, 2020 and February 3, 2019, the related Consolidated Statements of Earnings,
Comprehensive Income, Stockholders’ Equity, and Cash Flows for each of the fiscal years in the three‑year period
ended February 2, 2020, and the related notes (collectively, the Consolidated Financial Statements). In our opinion, the
Consolidated Financial Statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of
February 2, 2020 and February 3, 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the fiscal years
in the three‑year period ended February 2, 2020, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of February 2, 2020, based on criteria
established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of
the Treadway Commission, and our report dated March 25, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion on the effectiveness
of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting.
Change in Accounting Principle
As discussed in Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, the Company has changed its method of accounting
for leases as of February 4, 2019 due to the adoption of Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-02, Leases (Topic
842), and related amendments.
Basis for Opinion
These Consolidated Financial Statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to
express an opinion on these Consolidated Financial Statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the
U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and
the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the Consolidated Financial Statements are free of
material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of
material misstatement of the Consolidated Financial Statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing
procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the
amounts and disclosures in the Consolidated Financial Statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting
principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
Consolidated Financial Statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the Consolidated
Financial Statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1)
relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to the Consolidated Financial Statements and (2) involved our
especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in
any way our opinion on the Consolidated Financial Statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating
the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or
disclosures to which they relate.
Evaluation of the self-insurance liability
As discussed in Note 1 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, the Company is self-insured for certain losses related
to general liability (including product liability), workers’ compensation, employee group medical,
30
Table of Contents
and automobile claims. The Company recognizes the expected ultimate cost for claims incurred at the balance sheet
date as a liability. The expected ultimate cost for claims incurred is estimated based upon an analysis of historical data
and actuarial estimates determined by the Company’s third-party actuary.
We identified the evaluation of certain self-insurance liabilities as a critical audit matter, specifically those liabilities
related to general liability (including product liability) and workers’ compensation. Specialized skills were required to
evaluate the actuarial methods and assumptions used in determining certain self-insurance liabilities. There was a high
degree of judgment required to evaluate the Company’s key assumptions such as loss development factors and the
selection of ultimate losses among estimates derived using the various actuarial methods.
The primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter included the following. We tested certain
internal controls over the Company’s self-insurance liabilities process including controls over the review of the third-
party actuarial report and the actuarial methods and key assumptions used by the actuary in determining certain self-
insurance liabilities. We analyzed the key assumptions underlying the actuarial estimates by evaluating the reported
claims and claims payments. We involved actuarial professionals with specialized skills and knowledge, who assisted
in:
•Assessing the actuarial methods used by the Company’s third-party actuary, for consistency with generally
accepted actuarial standards and practices;
•Evaluating the key assumptions by comparing to historical data; and
•Developing an independent actuarial range of certain self-insurance liabilities, based on the Company’s
underlying historical paid and incurred loss data, and comparing the range to the Company’s estimated
liabilities.
Evaluation of gross unrecognized income tax benefits
As discussed in Notes 1 and 5 to the Consolidated Financial Statements, the Company recognizes the effect of income
tax positions if those positions are more likely than not of being sustained at the largest amount that is greater than
50% likely of being realized. The Company’s tax positions are subject to examination by domestic and foreign taxing
authorities and the resolution of such examinations may span multiple years. Since tax law is complex and often
subject to interpretations, there is uncertainty that some of the Company’s tax positions will be sustained upon
examination.
We identified the evaluation of the Company’s gross unrecognized tax benefits as a critical audit matter. Complex
auditor judgment was required to evaluate the Company’s interpretation of tax law and its identification and
determination of the ultimate resolution of its tax positions.
The primary procedures we performed to address this critical audit matter included the following. We tested certain
internal controls over the Company’s tax process to evaluate gross unrecognized tax benefits, including controls related
to (1) interpreting tax law, (2) evaluating which of the Company’s tax positions may not be sustained upon examination,
and (3) determination of the more-likely-than-not amount of the positions to be upheld. We involved tax professionals
with specialized skills and knowledge, who assisted in:
•Assessing the transfer pricing studies for compliance with applicable laws and regulations;
•Evaluating the Company’s interpretation of tax laws by developing an independent assessment based on our
understanding and interpretation of the tax laws;
•Inspecting settlements with applicable taxing authorities, and evaluating the expiration of statutes of limitations;
and
•Analyzing the Company’s assumptions and data used to determine the amount of tax benefits to recognize as
well as testing the Company’s calculations and comparing the results to the Company’s assessment.
/s/ KPMG LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1979.
Atlanta, Georgia
March 25, 2020
31
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
in millions, except per share dataFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Assets  
Current assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 2,133 $ 1,778
Receivables, net 2,106 1,936
Merchandise inventories 14,531 13,925
Other current assets 1,040 890
Total current assets 19,810 18,529
Net property and equipment 22,770 22,375
Operating lease right-of-use assets 5,595 —
Goodwill 2,254 2,252
Other assets 807 847
Total assets $ 51,236 $ 44,003
 
Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity  
Current liabilities:  
Short-term debt $ 974 $ 1,339
Accounts payable 7,787 7,755
Accrued salaries and related expenses 1,494 1,506
Sales taxes payable 605 656
Deferred revenue 2,116 1,782
Income taxes payable 55 11
Current installments of long-term debt 1,839 1,056
Current operating lease liabilities 828 —
Other accrued expenses 2,677 2,611
Total current liabilities 18,375 16,716
Long-term debt, excluding current installments 28,670 26,807
Long-term operating lease liabilities 5,066 —
Deferred income taxes 706 491
Other long-term liabilities 1,535 1,867
Total liabilities 54,352 45,881
 
Common stock, par value $0.05; authorized: 10,000 shares; issued: 1,786 shares at
February 2, 2020 and 1,782 shares at February 3, 2019; outstanding: 1,077 shares
at February 2, 2020 and 1,105 shares at February 3, 2019 89 89
Paid-in capital 11,001 10,578
Retained earnings 51,729 46,423
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (739) (772)
Treasury stock, at cost, 709 shares at February 2, 2020 and 677 shares at February
3, 2019 (65,196) (58,196)
Total stockholders’ (deficit) equity (3,116) (1,878)
Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity $ 51,236 $ 44,003
—————
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
32
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF EARNINGS
in millions, except per share dataFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
Net sales $ 110,225$ 108,203 $ 100,904
Cost of sales 72,653 71,043 66,548
Gross profit 37,572 37,160 34,356
Operating expenses:    
Selling, general and administrative 19,740 19,513 17,864
Depreciation and amortization 1,989 1,870 1,811
Impairment loss — 247 —
Total operating expenses 21,729 21,630 19,675
Operating income 15,843 15,530 14,681
Interest and other (income) expense:    
Interest and investment income (73) (93) (74)
Interest expense 1,201 1,051 1,057
Other — 16 —
Interest and other, net 1,128 974 983
Earnings before provision for income taxes 14,715 14,556 13,698
Provision for income taxes 3,473 3,435 5,068
Net earnings $ 11,242$ 11,121 $ 8,630
    
Basic weighted average common shares 1,093 1,137 1,178
Basic earnings per share $ 10.29$ 9.78 $ 7.33
    
Diluted weighted average common shares 1,097 1,143 1,184
Diluted earnings per share $ 10.25$ 9.73 $ 7.29
—————
Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
33
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
 Fiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
in millions2019  2018 2017
Net earnings $ 11,242 $ 11,121$ 8,630
Other comprehensive income (loss):    
Foreign currency translation adjustments 53 (267) 311
Cash flow hedges, net of tax 8 53 (1)
Other 3 8 (9)
Total other comprehensive income (loss) 64 (206) 301
Comprehensive income $ 11,306 $ 10,915$ 8,931
—————
Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
34
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
in millionsFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
Common Stock:   
Balance at beginning of year $ 89$ 89 $ 88
Shares issued under employee stock plans — — 1
Balance at end of year 89 89 89
   
Paid-in Capital:   
Balance at beginning of year 10,578 10,192 9,787
Shares issued under employee stock plans 172 104 132
Stock-based compensation expense 251 282 273
Balance at end of year 11,001 10,578 10,192
   
Retained Earnings:  
Balance at beginning of year 46,423 39,935 35,519
Cumulative effect of accounting changes 26 75 —
Net earnings 11,242 11,121 8,630
Cash dividends (5,958) (4,704) (4,212)
Other (4) (4) (2)
Balance at end of year 51,729 46,423 39,935
   
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss):  
Balance at beginning of year (772) (566) (867)
Cumulative effect of accounting changes (31) — —
Foreign currency translation adjustments 53 (267) 311
Cash flow hedges, net of tax 8 53 (1)
Other 3 8 (9)
Balance at end of year (739) (772) (566)
   
Treasury Stock:  
Balance at beginning of year (58,196) (48,196) (40,194)
Repurchases of common stock (7,000) (10,000) (8,002)
Balance at end of year (65,196) (58,196) (48,196)
Total stockholders’ (deficit) equity $ (3,116)$ (1,878) $ 1,454
—————
Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
35
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
 Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal
in millions2019 2018 2017
Cash Flows from Operating Activities:  
Net earnings $ 11,242$ 11,121$ 8,630
Reconciliation of net earnings to net cash provided by operating
activities:  
Depreciation and amortization 2,296 2,152 2,062
Stock-based compensation expense 251 282 273
Impairment loss — 247 —
Changes in receivables, net (170) 33 139
Changes in merchandise inventories (593) (1,244) (84)
Changes in other current assets (135) (257) (10)
Changes in accounts payable and accrued expenses 68 743 352
Changes in deferred revenue 334 80 128
Changes in income taxes payable 44 (42) 29
Changes in deferred income taxes 202 26 92
Other operating activities 184 (103) 420
Net cash provided by operating activities 13,723 13,038 12,031
  
Cash Flows from Investing Activities:  
Capital expenditures (2,678) (2,442) (1,897)
Payments for businesses acquired, net — (21) (374)
Proceeds from sales of property and equipment 37 33 47
Other investing activities (12) 14 (4)
Net cash used in investing activities (2,653) (2,416) (2,228)
  
Cash Flows from Financing Activities:  
(Repayments of) proceeds from short-term debt, net (365) (220) 850
Proceeds from long-term debt, net of discounts and premiums 3,420 3,466 2,991
Repayments of long-term debt (1,070) (1,209) (543)
Repurchases of common stock (6,965) (9,963) (8,000)
Proceeds from sales of common stock 280 236 255
Cash dividends (5,958) (4,704) (4,212)
Other financing activities (176) (26) (211)
Net cash used in financing activities (10,834) (12,420) (8,870)
Change in cash and cash equivalents 236 (1,798) 933
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash and cash equivalents 119 (19) 124
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 1,778 3,595 2,538
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 2,133$ 1,778$ 3,595
  
Supplemental Disclosures:  
Cash paid for income taxes $ 3,220$ 3,774$ 4,732
Cash paid for interest, net of interest capitalized 1,112 1,035 991
Non-cash capital expenditures 136 248 150
—————
Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks. Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks.
See accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.
36
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
1.SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Business
The Home Depot, Inc., together with its subsidiaries (the “Company,” “Home Depot,” “we,” “our” or “us”), is a home
improvement retailer that sells a wide assortment of building materials, home improvement products, lawn and garden
products, and décor items and provides a number of services, in stores and online. We operate in the U.S. (including
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico and the territories of the U.S. Virgin Islands and Guam), Canada, and Mexico.
Consolidation and Presentation
Our consolidated financial statements include our accounts and those of our wholly-owned subsidiaries. All significant
intercompany transactions have been eliminated in consolidation. Certain amounts in prior fiscal years have been
reclassified to conform with the presentation adopted in the current fiscal year. Our fiscal year is a 52- or 53-week
period ending on the Sunday nearest to January 31st. Fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2017 include 52 weeks while fiscal 2018
includes 53 weeks.
Use of Estimates
We have made a number of estimates and assumptions relating to the reporting of assets and liabilities, the disclosure
of contingent assets and liabilities, and reported amounts of revenues and expenses in preparing these financial
statements in conformity with GAAP. Actual results could differ from these estimates.
Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments purchased with original maturities of three months or less to be cash
equivalents. Our cash equivalents are carried at fair market value and consist primarily of money market funds.
Receivables
The components of receivables, net, follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Card receivables $ 778 $ 696
Rebate receivables 668 660
Customer receivables 292 284
Other receivables 368 296
Receivables, net $ 2,106 $ 1,936
Card receivables consist of payments due from financial institutions for the settlement of credit card and debit card
transactions. Rebate receivables represent amounts due from vendors for volume and co-op advertising rebates.
Customer receivables relate to credit extended directly to certain customers in the ordinary course of business. The
valuation allowance related these receivables was not material to our consolidated financial statements at the end of
fiscal 2019 or fiscal 2018.
Merchandise Inventories
The substantial majority of our merchandise inventories are stated at the lower of cost (first-in, first-out) or market, as
determined by the retail inventory method, which is based on a number of factors such as markups, markdowns, and
inventory losses (or shrink). As the inventory retail value is adjusted regularly to reflect market conditions, inventory
valued using the retail method approximates the lower of cost or market. Certain subsidiaries, including retail
operations in Canada and Mexico, and distribution centers, record merchandise inventories at the lower of cost or net
realizable value, as determined by a cost method. These merchandise inventories represent approximately 29% of the
total merchandise inventories balance. We evaluate the inventory valued using a cost method at the end of each
quarter to ensure that it is carried at the lower of cost or net realizable value. The valuation allowance for merchandise
inventories valued under a cost method was not material to our consolidated financial statements at the end of fiscal
2019 or fiscal 2018.
37
Table of Contents
Independent physical inventory counts or cycle counts are taken on a regular basis in each store and distribution center
to ensure that amounts reflected in merchandise inventories are properly stated. Shrink (or in the case of excess
inventory, swell) is the difference between the recorded amount of inventory and the physical inventory. We calculate
shrink based on actual inventory losses occurring as a result of physical inventory counts during each fiscal period and
estimated inventory losses occurring between physical inventory counts. The estimate for shrink occurring in the interim
period between physical inventory counts is calculated on a store-specific basis based on recent shrink results and
current trends in the business.
Property and Equipment
Buildings, furniture, fixtures, and equipment are recorded at cost and depreciated using the straight-line method over
their estimated useful lives. Leasehold improvements are amortized using the straight-line method over the original
term of the lease or the useful life of the improvement, whichever is shorter.
The estimated useful lives of our property and equipment follow:
 Life
Buildings 5 – 45 years
Furniture, fixtures and equipment 2 – 20 years
Leasehold improvements 5 – 45 years
We capitalize certain costs, including interest, related to construction in progress and the acquisition and development
of software. Costs associated with the acquisition and development of software are amortized using the straight-line
method over the estimated useful life of the software, which is three to six years. Certain development costs not
meeting the criteria for capitalization are expensed as incurred.
We evaluate our long-lived assets each quarter for indicators of potential impairment. Indicators of impairment include
current period losses combined with a history of losses, our decision to relocate or close a store or other location before
the end of its previously estimated useful life, or when changes in other circumstances indicate the carrying amount of
an asset may not be recoverable. The evaluation for long-lived assets is performed at the lowest level of identifiable
cash flows, which is generally the individual store level. The assets of a store with indicators of impairment are
evaluated for recoverability by comparing its undiscounted future cash flows with its carrying value. If the carrying value
is greater than the undiscounted future cash flows, we then measure the asset’s fair value to determine whether an
impairment loss should be recognized. If the resulting fair value is less than the carrying value, an impairment loss is
recognized for the difference between the carrying value and the estimated fair value. Impairment losses on property
and equipment are recorded as a component of SG&A. When a leased location closes, we also recognize, in SG&A,
the net present value of future lease obligations less estimated sublease income. Impairments and lease obligation
costs on closings and relocations were not material to our consolidated financial statements in fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018,
or fiscal 2017.
Leases
On February 4, 2019, we adopted the new leases standard using the modified retrospective transition method, which
requires that we recognize leases differently pre- and post-adoption. See “Recently Adopted Accounting
Pronouncements—ASU No. 2016-02” below for more information.
We categorize leases at their inception as either operating or finance leases. Lease agreements cover certain retail
locations, office space, warehouse and distribution space, equipment, and vehicles. Operating leases are included in
operating lease right-of-use assets, current operating lease liabilities, and long-term operating lease liabilities in our
consolidated balance sheets. Finance leases are included in net property and equipment, current installments of long-
term debt, and long-term debt, excluding current installments in our consolidated balance sheets.
Leased assets represent our right to use an underlying asset for the lease term, and lease liabilities represent our
obligation to make lease payments arising from the lease. Operating lease right-of-use assets and liabilities are
recognized at commencement date based on the present value of lease payments over the lease term. We use a
secured incremental borrowing rate as the discount rate for present value of lease payments when the rate implicit in
the contract is not readily determinable. We determine a secured rate on a quarterly basis and update the weighted
average discount rate accordingly. For operating leases with variable payments dependent upon an index or rate that
commenced subsequent to adoption of ASU No. 2016-02, we apply the active index or rate as of the lease
commencement date. Variable lease payments not based on an index or rate are not included in the operating lease
liability as they cannot be reasonably estimated and are recognized in the period in which the obligation for those
payments is incurred. Leases that have a term of twelve months or less upon commencement
38
Table of Contents
date are considered short-term in nature. Accordingly, short-term leases are not included on the consolidated balance
sheets and are expensed on a straight-line basis over the lease term, which commences on the date we have the right
to control the property.
Goodwill
Goodwill represents the excess of purchase price over the fair value of net assets acquired. We do not amortize
goodwill, but assess the recoverability of goodwill in the third quarter of each fiscal year, or more often if indicators
warrant, by determining whether the fair value of each reporting unit supports its carrying value. Each fiscal year, we
may assess qualitative factors to determine whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of each reporting unit is
less than its carrying amount as a basis for determining whether it is necessary to complete quantitative impairment
assessments, with a quantitative assessment completed at least once every three years. We completed our last
quantitative assessment in fiscal 2019.
In fiscal 2019, we completed our annual assessment of the recoverability of goodwill for the U.S., Canada, and Mexico
reporting units, performed through quantitative assessments, and concluded that the fair value of the reporting units
substantially exceeded their respective carrying values, including goodwill. There were no impairment charges related
to goodwill for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018, or fiscal 2017.
Changes in the carrying amount of our goodwill follow:
in millionsFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
Goodwill, balance at beginning of year $ 2,252$ 2,275 $ 2,093
Acquisitions (1)— 4 164
Dispositions — (15) —
Other (2)2 (12) 18
Goodwill, balance at end of year $ 2,254$ 2,252 $ 2,275
—————
(1)Includes purchase price allocation adjustments.
(2)Primarily reflects the impact of foreign currency translation.
Other Intangible Assets
We amortize the cost of other finite-lived intangible assets over their estimated useful lives, which range up to 12 years.
Intangible assets with indefinite lives are tested in the third quarter of each fiscal year for impairment, or more often if
indicators warrant. Intangible assets other than goodwill are included in other assets.
In fiscal 2018, we recognized a pre-tax impairment loss of $247 million for certain trade names as a result of a shift in
strategy for our MRO business. Our remaining finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangibles were not material at the end of
fiscal 2019 or fiscal 2018.
Debt
We record any premiums or discounts associated with an issuance of long-term debt as a direct addition or deduction
to the carrying value of the related senior notes. We also record debt issuance costs associated with an issuance of
long-term debt as a direct deduction to the carrying value of the related senior notes. Premium, discount, and debt
issuance costs are amortized over the term of the respective notes using the effective interest rate method.
Derivatives
We use derivative financial instruments in the management of our interest rate exposure on long-term debt and our
exposure to foreign currency fluctuations. For derivatives that are designated as hedges, changes in their fair values
that are considered effective are either accounted for in earnings or recognized in other comprehensive income or loss
until the hedged item is recognized in earnings, depending on the nature of the hedge. Derivative financial instruments
that do not qualify for hedge accounting are recorded at fair value with unrealized gains or losses reported in earnings.
All qualifying derivative financial instruments are recognized at their fair values in either assets or liabilities at the
balance sheet date and are reported on a gross basis.
39
Table of Contents
Insurance
We are self-insured for certain losses related to general liability (including product liability), workers’ compensation,
employee group medical, and automobile claims. We recognize the expected ultimate cost for claims incurred
(undiscounted) at the balance sheet date as a liability. The expected ultimate cost for claims incurred is estimated
based upon analysis of historical data and actuarial estimates.
Our self-insurance liabilities, which are included in accrued salaries and related expenses, other accrued expenses and
other long-term liabilities in the consolidated balance sheets, were $1.3 billion at February 2, 2020 and February 3,
2019.
We also maintain network security and privacy liability insurance coverage to limit our exposure to losses such as those
that may be caused by a significant compromise or breach of our data security. Insurance-related expenses are
included in SG&A.
Treasury Stock
Treasury stock is reflected as a reduction of stockholders’ equity at cost. We use the weighted-average purchase cost
to determine the cost of treasury stock that is reissued, if any.
Net Sales
On January 29, 2018, we adopted the new revenue recognition guidance per ASU No. 2014-09 using the modified
retrospective transition method, which requires that we recognize revenue differently pre- and post-adoption.
Fiscal 2018 and Subsequent Periods. We recognize revenue, net of expected returns and sales tax, at the time the
customer takes possession of merchandise or when a service is performed. The liability for sales returns, including the
impact to gross profit, is estimated based on historical return levels and recognized at the transaction price. We also
recognize a return asset, and corresponding adjustment to cost of sales, for our right to recover the goods returned by
the customer, measured at the former carrying amount of the goods, less any expected recovery cost. At each financial
reporting date, we assess our estimates of expected returns, refund liabilities, and return assets.
Net sales include services revenue generated through a variety of installation, home maintenance, and professional
service programs. In these programs, the customer selects and purchases material for a project, and we provide or
arrange for professional installation. These programs are offered through our stores, online, and in-home sales
programs. Under certain programs, when we provide or arrange for the installation of a project and the subcontractor
provides material as part of the installation, both the material and labor are included in services revenue. We recognize
this revenue when the service for the customer is complete, which is not materially different from recognizing the
revenue over the service period as the substantial majority of our services are completed within one week.
For product sold in stores or online, payment is typically due at the point of sale. For services, payment in full is due
upon completion of the job. When we receive payment from customers before the customer has taken possession of
the merchandise or the service has been performed, the amount received is recorded as deferred revenue until the
sale or service is complete. Such performance obligations are part of contracts with expected original durations of three
months or less. We further record deferred revenue for the sale of gift cards and recognize the associated revenue
upon the redemption of those gift cards in net sales. Gift card breakage income, which is our estimate of the non-
redeemed gift card balance and recognized in net sales, was immaterial in fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018.
We also have agreements with third-party service providers who directly extend credit to customers, manage our PLCC
program, and own the related receivables. We have evaluated the third-party entities holding the receivables under the
program and concluded that they should not be consolidated. The agreement with the primary third-party service
provider for our PLCC program expires in 2028, with us having the option, but no obligation, to purchase the existing
receivables at the end of the agreement. Deferred interest charges incurred for our deferred financing programs offered
to these customers, interchange fees charged to us for their use of the cards, and any profit sharing with the third-party
service providers are included in net sales.
Fiscal 2017. We recognize revenue, net of estimated returns and sales tax, at the time the customer takes possession
of merchandise or when a service is performed. The liability for sales returns, including the impact to gross profit, is
estimated based on historical return levels.
Net sales include services revenue generated through a variety of installation, home maintenance, and professional
service programs. In these programs, the customer selects and purchases material for a project, and we provide or
arrange professional installation. These programs are offered through our stores and in-home sales programs.
40
Table of Contents
Under certain programs, when we provide or arrange the installation of a project and the subcontractor provides
material as part of the installation, both the material and labor are included in services revenue. We recognize this
revenue when the service for the customer is complete.
When we receive payment from customers before the customer has taken possession of the merchandise or the
service has been performed, the amount received is recorded as deferred revenue until the sale or service is complete.
We also record deferred revenue for the sale of gift cards and recognize this revenue upon the redemption of gift cards
in net sales. Gift card breakage income, which is our estimate of the non-redeemed gift card balance and recognized
as a reduction to SG&A, was immaterial in fiscal 2017.
Deferred interest charges incurred for our deferred financing programs offered to customers are included in cost of
sales in fiscal 2017. Interchange fees and any profit sharing related to the PLCC program are included in SG&A in fiscal
2017.
Cost of Sales
Cost of sales includes the actual cost of merchandise sold and services performed; the cost of transportation of
merchandise from vendors to our distribution network, stores, or customers; shipping and handling costs from our
stores or distribution network to customers; and the operating cost and depreciation of our sourcing and distribution
network and online fulfillment centers. In fiscal 2017, cost of sales also included cost of deferred interest programs
offered through our PLCC programs.
Vendor Allowances
Vendor allowances primarily consist of volume rebates that are earned as a result of attaining certain purchase levels
and co-op advertising allowances for the promotion of vendors’ products that are typically based on guaranteed
minimum amounts with additional amounts being earned for attaining certain purchase levels. These vendor
allowances are accrued as earned, with those allowances received as a result of attaining certain purchase levels
accrued over the incentive period based on estimates of purchases. Volume rebates and certain co-op advertising
allowances reduce the carrying cost of inventory and are recognized in cost of sales when the related inventory is sold.
Certain other co-op advertising allowances that are reimbursements of specific, incremental, and identifiable costs
incurred to promote vendors’ products are recorded as an offset against advertising expense in SG&A. The co-op
advertising allowances recorded as an offset to advertising expense follow:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Specific, incremental, and identifiable co-op advertising allowances$ 282 $ 235$ 198
Advertising Expense
Television and radio advertising production costs, along with media placement costs, are expensed when the
advertisement first appears. Certain co-op advertising allowances are recorded as an offset against advertising
expense. Gross advertising expense included in SG&A follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Gross advertising expense $ 1,186 $ 1,156$ 995
Stock-Based Compensation
We are currently authorized to issue incentive and nonqualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted
stock, restricted stock units, performance shares, performance units, and deferred shares to certain of our associates
and non-employee directors under certain stock incentive plans. We measure and recognize compensation expense for
all share-based payment awards made to associates and non-employee directors based on estimated fair values. The
value of the portion of the award that is ultimately expected to vest is recognized as stock-based compensation
expense over the requisite service period or as restrictions lapse. Additional information on our stock-based payment
awards is included in Note 8.
Income Taxes
Income taxes are accounted for under the asset and liability method. We provide for federal, state, and foreign income
taxes currently payable, as well as for those deferred due to timing differences between reporting income and
expenses for financial statement purposes versus tax purposes. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
41
Table of Contents
recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to temporary differences between the financial statement
carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
measured using enacted income tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary
differences are expected to be recovered or settled. The effect of a change in income tax rates is recognized as income
or expense in the period that includes the enactment date.
We recognize the effect of income tax positions only if those positions are more likely than not of being sustained.
Recognized income tax positions are measured at the largest amount that is greater than 50% likely of being realized.
Changes in recognition or measurement are reflected in the period in which the change in judgment occurs.
We file a consolidated U.S. federal income tax return which includes certain eligible subsidiaries. Non-U.S. subsidiaries
and certain U.S. subsidiaries, which are consolidated for financial reporting purposes, are not eligible to be included in
our consolidated U.S. federal income tax return. Separate provisions for income taxes have been determined for these
entities. For unremitted earnings of our non-U.S. subsidiaries, we are required to make an assertion regarding
reinvestment or repatriation for tax purposes. For any earnings that we do not make a permanent reinvestment
assertion, we recognize a provision for deferred income taxes. For earnings where we have made a permanent
reinvestment assertion, no provision is recognized. See Note 5 for further discussion.
Comprehensive Income
Comprehensive income includes net earnings adjusted for certain gains and losses that are excluded from net earnings
under GAAP, which consists primarily of foreign currency translation adjustments.
Foreign Currency Translation
Assets and liabilities denominated in a foreign currency are translated into U.S. dollars at the current rate of exchange
on the last day of the reporting period. Revenues and expenses are translated using average exchange rates for the
period and equity transactions are translated using the actual rate on the day of the transaction.
Reclassifications
Certain prior period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year’s financial statement presentation.
Recently Adopted Accounting Pronouncements
ASU No. 2018-02. In February 2018, the FASB issued ASU No. 2018-02, “Income Statement—Reporting
Comprehensive Income (Topic 220): Reclassification of Certain Tax Effects from Accumulated Other Comprehensive
Income,” which allows for an optional reclassification from accumulated other comprehensive income to retained
earnings for stranded tax effects as a result of the Tax Act. On February 4, 2019, we adopted ASU No. 2018-02,
resulting in an increase of $31 million to retained earnings and a decrease of $31 million to accumulated other
comprehensive income.
ASU No. 2017-12. In August 2017, the FASB issued ASU No. 2017-12, “Derivatives and Hedging (Topic 815): Targeted
Improvements to Accounting for Hedging Activities,” which amends the hedge accounting recognition and presentation
requirements. ASU No. 2017-12 eliminates the concept of recognizing periodic hedge ineffectiveness for cash flow and
net investment hedges and allows an entity to apply the shortcut method to partial-term fair value hedges of interest
rate risk. On February 4, 2019, we adopted ASU No. 2017-12 with no material impact to our consolidated financial
statements. We expect the impact of the adoption to be immaterial to our financial position, results of operations, and
cash flows on an ongoing basis.
ASU No. 2016-02. In February 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-02, “Leases (Topic 842),” which establishes a
right-of-use model and requires an entity that is a lessee to recognize the right-of-use assets and liabilities arising from
leases on the balance sheets. ASU No. 2016-02 also requires disclosures about the amount, timing, and uncertainty of
cash flows arising from leases. Leases will be classified as finance or operating, with classification affecting both the
pattern and classification of expense recognition in the statements of earnings. This guidance was subsequently
amended by ASU No. 2018-01, “Leases (Topic 842): Land Easement Practical Expedient for Transition to Topic 842;”
ASU No. 2018-10, “Codification Improvements to Topic 842;” and ASU No. 2018-11, “Leases (Topic 842): Targeted
Improvements.” ASU No. 2016-02 and subsequent updates require a modified retrospective transition, with the
cumulative effect of transition, including initial recognition of lease assets and liabilities for existing operating leases, as
of (i) the effective date or (ii) the beginning of the earliest comparative period presented. These updates also provide a
number of practical expedients for implementation which we are applying, as discussed below.
42
Table of Contents
On February 4, 2019 (the “effective date”), we adopted ASU No. 2016-02 and subsequent updates, collectively referred
to as “Topic 842”, using the modified retrospective transition method. In addition, we adopted the package of practical
expedients in transition, which permits us to not reassess our prior conclusions pertaining to lease identification, lease
classification, and initial direct costs on leases that commenced prior to our adoption of the new standard. We also
elected the ongoing practical expedient to not recognize operating lease right-of-use assets and operating lease
liabilities related to short-term leases. We did not elect the use-of-hindsight or land easements practical expedients. For
leases beginning subsequent to the effective date, we elected to not separate lease and non-lease components for
certain classes of assets including real estate and certain equipment. To determine the measurement of the lease
liability for operating leases with variable payments based on an index or rate that commenced prior to the adoption of
Topic 842, we elected to apply the active index or rate at the effective date.
As a result of adopting Topic 842, we recognized net operating lease right-of-use assets of $5.7 billion and operating
lease liabilities of $6.0 billion on the effective date. Existing prepaid rent, accrued rent, and closed store reserves were
recorded as an offset to our gross operating lease right-of-use assets. The cumulative effect of the adoption resulted in
an immaterial adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings as of February 4, 2019. The standard did not
have a material impact on our results of operations or cash flows.
Recently Issued Accounting Pronouncements
ASU No. 2019-12. In December 2019, the FASB issued ASU No. 2019-12, “Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the
Accounting for Income Taxes,” as part of its overall simplification initiative to reduce costs and complexity of applying
accounting standards while maintaining or improving the usefulness of the information provided to users of financial
statements. Amendments include removal of certain exceptions to the general principles of Topic 740, “Income Taxes,”
and simplification in several other areas. ASU No. 2019-12 is effective for annual reporting periods beginning after
December 15, 2020, and interim periods therein. We are evaluating the effect it will have on our consolidated financial
statements and related disclosures and do not anticipate a material impact.
ASU No. 2018-15. In August 2018, the FASB issued ASU No. 2018-15, “Intangibles – Goodwill and Other – Internal-
Use Software (Subtopic 350-40): Customer’s Accounting for Implementation Costs Incurred in a Cloud Computing
Arrangement That is a Service Contract,” which aligns the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred
in a hosting arrangement with the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred to develop or obtain
internal-use software. ASU No. 2018-15 is effective beginning in the first quarter of fiscal 2020. Early adoption is
permitted. We will adopt this standard in the first quarter of 2020. We have evaluated the effect it will have on our
consolidated financial statements and related disclosures and noted no material impact.
ASU No. 2017-04. In January 2017, the FASB issued ASU No. 2017-04, “Intangibles – Goodwill and Other (Topic 350):
Simplifying the Test for Goodwill Impairment,” which simplifies how an entity is required to test goodwill for impairment.
The amendments in ASU No. 2017-04 require goodwill impairment to be measured using the difference between the
carrying amount and the fair value of the reporting unit and require the loss recognized to not exceed the total amount
of goodwill allocated to that reporting unit. ASU No. 2017-04 should be applied on a prospective basis and is effective
for our annual goodwill impairment tests beginning in the first quarter of fiscal 2020. Early adoption is permitted. We
have evaluated the effect that ASU No. 2017-04 will have on our consolidated financial statements and related
disclosures and noted no material impact.
ASU No. 2016-13. In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU No. 2016-13, “Financial Instruments – Credit Losses (Topic
326): Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments,” which introduced an expected credit loss model for the
impairment of financial assets measured at amortized cost. The model replaces the probable, incurred loss model for
those assets and instead, broadens the information an entity must consider in developing its expected credit loss
estimate for assets measured at amortized cost. ASU No. 2016-13 is effective beginning in the first quarter of fiscal
2020. Early adoption is permitted. We will adopt this standard in the first quarter of 2020. We have evaluated the effect
it will have on our consolidated financial statements and related disclosures and noted no material impact.
Recent accounting pronouncements pending adoption not discussed above are either not applicable or are not
expected to have a material impact on our consolidated financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows.
2.NET SALES AND SEGMENT REPORTING
We currently conduct our retail operations in the U.S., Canada, and Mexico, each of which represents one of our three
operating segments. Our operating segments reflect the way in which internally-reported financial information is used to
make decisions and allocate resources. For disclosure purposes, we aggregate these three operating segments into
one reportable segment due to their similar operating and financial characteristics and how the business is managed.
43
Table of Contents
The assets of each of our operating segments primarily consist of net property and equipment and merchandise
inventories. Long-lived assets, classified by geography, follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019January 28,
2018
Long-lived assets – in the U.S. $ 20,302 $ 19,930$ 19,526
Long-lived assets – outside the U.S. 2,468 2,445 2,549
Total long-lived assets $ 22,770 $ 22,375$ 22,075
No sales to an individual customer accounted for more than 10% of revenue during any of the last three fiscal years.
Net sales, classified by geography, follow:
 Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal
in millions 2019 2018 2017
Net sales – in the U.S. $ 101,333$ 99,386$ 92,413
Net sales – outside the U.S. 8,892 8,817 8,491
Net sales $ 110,225$ 108,203$ 100,904
Net sales by products and services follow:
 Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal
in millions 2019 2018 2017
Net sales – products $ 105,194$ 102,933$ 95,956
Net sales – services 5,031 5,270 4,948
Net sales $ 110,225$ 108,203$ 100,904
Major product lines and the related merchandising departments (and related services) follow:
Major Product Line  Merchandising Departments
Building Materials  Building Materials, Electrical/Lighting, Lumber, Millwork, and Plumbing
Décor  Appliances, Décor/Storage, Flooring, Kitchen and Bath, and Paint
Hardlines  Hardware, Indoor Garden, Outdoor Garden, and Tools
During the first quarter of fiscal 2019, we combined the Electrical and Lighting merchandising departments into one
department, Electrical/Lighting, and we renamed the Décor merchandising department to Décor/Storage. These
changes had no impact on our net sales presentations.
Net sales by major product lines (and related services) follow:
 Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal
in millions 2019 2018 2017
Building Materials $ 39,338$ 39,883$ 37,296
Décor 37,390 36,273 33,593
Hardlines 33,497 32,047 30,015
Net sales $ 110,225$ 108,203$ 100,904
—————
Note: Net sales for certain merchandising departments were reclassified in the first quarter of fiscal 2019. As a result, prior -year
amounts have been reclassified to conform with the current-year presentation.
44
Table of Contents
Net sales by merchandising department (and related services) follow:
 Fiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
 2019  2018 2017
dollars in millionsNet
Sales  % of
Net Sales  Net
Sales  % of
Net SalesNet
Sales% of
Net Sales
Appliances $ 9,852 8.9%  $ 9,027 8.3% $ 8,167 8.1%
Building Materials 7,712 7.0  7,770 7.2 7,266 7.2
Décor/Storage 3,758 3.4  3,583 3.3 3,175 3.1
Electrical/Lighting 9,844 8.9  9,941 9.2 9,441 9.4
Flooring 7,443 6.8  7,494 6.9 6,992 6.9
Hardware 6,381 5.8  6,203 5.7 5,878 5.8
Indoor Garden 10,989 10.0  10,450 9.7 9,785 9.7
Kitchen and Bath 7,717 7.0  7,728 7.1 7,275 7.2
Lumber 7,894 7.2  8,393 7.8 7,797 7.7
Millwork 5,757 5.2  5,757 5.3 5,382 5.3
Outdoor Garden 7,564 6.9  7,259 6.7 6,984 6.9
Paint 8,620 7.8  8,441 7.8 7,984 7.9
Plumbing 8,131 7.4  8,022 7.4 7,410 7.3
Tools 8,563 7.8  8,135 7.5 7,368 7.3
Total $110,225 100.0%  $108,203 100.0% $100,904 100.0%
—————
Note: Certain percentages may not sum to totals due to rounding. Net sales for certain merchandising departments were reclassified in fiscal 2019.
As a result, prior year net sales have been reclassified to conform with the current year presentation. Prior year percent of net sales data also reflects
the new classifications.
3.PROPERTY AND LEASES
Net Property and Equipment
The components of net property and equipment follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Land $ 8,390 $ 8,363
Buildings 18,432 18,199
Furniture, fixtures, and equipment 13,666 12,460
Leasehold improvements 1,789 1,705
Construction in progress 1,005 820
Finance leases 1,578 1,392
Property and equipment, at cost 44,860 42,939
Less accumulated depreciation and finance lease amortization 22,090 20,564
Net property and equipment $ 22,770 $ 22,375
Depreciation and finance lease amortization expense, including depreciation expense included in cost of sales, follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Depreciation and finance lease amortization expense $ 2,223 $ 2,076$ 1,983
Leases
We lease certain retail locations, office space, warehouse and distribution space, equipment, and vehicles. We
consider various factors such as market conditions and the terms of any renewal options that may exist to determine
whether we will renew or replace the lease. A substantial majority of our leases have remaining lease
45
Table of Contents
terms of one to 20 years, typically with the option to extend the leases for up to five years. Some of our leases may
include the option to terminate in less than five years. In the event we are reasonably certain to exercise the option to
extend a lease, we will include the extended terms in the related lease assets and liabilities. Real estate taxes,
insurance, maintenance, and operating expenses applicable to the leased property are generally our obligations under
the lease agreements.
Our lease agreements do not contain any material residual value guarantees or material restrictive covenants. Further,
certain lease agreements include rental payments based on an index or rate and others include rental payments based
on a percentage of sales.
The consolidated balance sheet location of assets and liabilities related to operating and finance leases follow:
in millions Consolidated Balance Sheet CaptionFebruary 2,
2020
Assets:   
Operating lease assets Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 5,595
Finance lease assets (1)Net property and equipment 934
Total lease assets  $ 6,529
   
Liabilities:   
Current:   
   Operating lease liabilities Current operating lease liabilities $ 828
   Finance lease liabilities Current installments of long-term debt 84
Long-term:   
   Operating lease liabilities Long-term operating lease liabilities 5,066
   Finance lease liabilities Long-term debt, excluding current installments 1,081
Total lease liabilities  $ 7,059
—————
(1)Finance lease assets are recorded net of accumulated amortization of $644 million as of February 2, 2020.
The components of lease cost follow:
 Fiscal
in millions Consolidated Statement of Earnings Caption 2019
Operating lease cost Selling, general and administrative $ 827
Finance lease cost:  
Amortization of leased assets Depreciation and amortization 86
Interest on lease liabilities Interest expense 92
Short-term lease cost Selling, general and administrative 98
Variable lease cost Selling, general and administrative 241
Sublease income Selling, general and administrative (14)
Net lease cost $ 1,330
46
Table of Contents
ASU 2016-02 requires that public companies use a secured incremental borrowing rate as the discount rate for the
present value of lease payments when the rate implicit in the contract is not readily determinable. We determine a
secured rate on a quarterly basis and update the weighted average discount rate accordingly. Lease terms and
discount rates follow:
 February 2,
2020
Weighted Average Remaining Lease Term (Years):  
Operating leases 10
Finance leases 12
  
Weighted Average Discount Rate:  
Operating leases 3.1%
Finance leases 10.4%
The approximate future minimum lease payments under operating and finance leases at February 2, 2020 follow:
in millionsOperating
Leases  Finance
Leases
Fiscal 2020 $ 955 $ 172
Fiscal 2021 875 171
Fiscal 2022 772 170
Fiscal 2023 677 164
Fiscal 2024 579 148
Thereafter 2,822 948
Total lease payments 6,680 1,773
Less imputed interest 786 608
Present value of lease liabilities $ 5,894 $ 1,165
—————
Note: Amounts presented do not include payments relating to immaterial leases excluded from the consolidated balance sheets as part of transition
elections adopted upon implementation of Topic 842. Additionally, we have excluded approximately $1.9 billion of leases (undiscounted basis) that
have not yet commenced. These leases will commence between 2020 and 2021 with lease terms of one to 20 years.
The approximate future minimum lease payments under capital and operating leases at February 3, 2019 and
accounted for under previous lease guidance follow:
in millionsOperating
LeasesCapital
Leases
Fiscal 2019 $ 976$ 150
Fiscal 2020 912 167
Fiscal 2021 792 143
Fiscal 2022 682 142
Fiscal 2023 584 137
Thereafter 3,090 970
 $ 7,036 1,709
Less imputed interest  660
Net present value of capital lease obligations  1,049
Less current installments  57
Long-term capital lease obligations, excluding current installments  $ 992
47
Table of Contents
Other lease information follows for fiscal 2019:
 Fiscal
in millions 2019
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities:  
Operating cash flows – operating leases $ 1,003
Operating cash flows – finance leases 92
Financing cash flows – finance leases 70
Lease assets obtained in exchange for new operating lease liabilities 748
Lease assets obtained in exchange for new finance lease liabilities 186
4.DEBT AND DERIVATIVE INSTRUMENTS
Short-Term Debt
We have commercial paper programs with an aggregate borrowing capacity of $3.0 billion. All of our short-term
borrowings in fiscal 2019 and fiscal 2018 were under these commercial paper programs. In connection with these
programs, we have back-up credit facilities with a consortium of banks for borrowings up to $3.0 billion, which consist of
a 364-day $1.0 billion credit facility and a five-year $2.0 billion credit facility, which expires in December 2022. In
December 2019, we completed the renewal of our 364-day $1.0 billion credit facility, extending the maturity from
December 2019 to December 2020.
Certain information on our commercial paper programs follows:
dollars in millionsFebruary 2,
2020February 3,
2019
Weighted average interest rate 1.56% 2.41%
Balance outstanding at fiscal year-end $ 974 $ 1,339
Maximum amount outstanding at any month-end $ 2,097 $ 2,264
Average daily short-term borrowings $ 624 $ 621
48
Table of Contents
Long-Term Debt
Details of the components of our long-term debt follow:
  Carrying Amount
in millionsInterest
PayablePrincipal
AmountFebruary 2,
2020February 3,
2019
2.00% Senior notes due June 2019 Semi-annually $ — $ — $ 999
Floating rate senior notes due June 2020 Quarterly 500 500 499
1.80% Senior notes due June 2020 Semi-annually 750 750 749
3.95% Senior notes due September 2020 Semi-annually 500 506 499
4.40% Senior notes due April 2021 Semi-annually 1,000 999 999
2.00% Senior notes due April 2021 Semi-annually 1,350 1,348 1,345
Floating rate senior notes due March 2022 Quarterly 300 299 299
3.25% Senior notes due March 2022 Semi-annually 700 698 696
2.625% Senior notes due June 2022 Semi-annually 1,250 1,246 1,245
2.70% Senior notes due April 2023 Semi-annually 1,000 998 997
3.75% Senior notes due February 2024 Semi-annually 1,100 1,095 1,094
3.35% Senior notes due September 2025 Semi-annually 1,000 996 995
3.00% Senior notes due April 2026 Semi-annually 1,300 1,290 1,288
2.125% Senior notes due September 2026 Semi-annually 1,000 989 987
2.80% Senior notes due September 2027 Semi-annually 1,000 1,007 981
3.90% Senior notes due December 2028 Semi-annually 1,000 1,059 1,005
2.95% Senior notes due June 2029 Semi-annually 1,750 1,797 —
5.875% Senior notes due December 2036 Semi-annually 3,000 2,953 2,951
5.40% Senior notes due September 2040 Semi-annually 500 495 495
5.95% Senior notes due April 2041 Semi-annually 1,000 989 989
4.20% Senior notes due April 2043 Semi-annually 1,000 989 989
4.875% Senior notes due February 2044 Semi-annually 1,000 979 979
4.40% Senior notes due March 2045 Semi-annually 1,000 978 977
4.25% Senior notes due April 2046 Semi-annually 1,600 1,585 1,585
3.90% Senior notes due June 2047 Semi-annually 1,150 1,144 738
4.50% Senior notes due December 2048 Semi-annually 1,500 1,462 1,462
3.125% Senior notes due December 2049 Semi-annually 1,250 1,221 —
3.50% Senior notes due September 2056 Semi-annually 1,000 972 972
Total senior notes  $ 29,500 29,344 26,814
Finance lease obligations; payable in varying
installments through January 31, 2055  1,165 1,049
Total long-term debt  30,509 27,863
Less current installments of long-term debt  1,839 1,056
Long-term debt, excluding current installments $ 28,670$ 26,807
January 2020 Issuance. In January, we issued two tranches of senior notes.
•The first tranche consisted of $750 million of 2.95% senior notes due June 15, 2029 (the “2029 notes”) at a
premium of $32 million. The 2029 notes form a single series with the Company’s $1.0 billion 2.95% senior
notes due June 15, 2029 that were issued in June 2019 and have the same terms. The aggregate principal
amount outstanding of the Company’s senior notes due June 15, 2029 is $1.8 billion. Interest on the 2029
notes is due semi-annually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning June 15, 2020, with interest
accruing from December 15, 2019.
49
Table of Contents
•The second tranche consisted of $1.3 billion of 3.125% senior notes due December 15, 2049 (the “2049
notes”) at a discount of $16 million (together with the 2029 notes, the “January 2020 issuance”). Interest on the
2049 notes is due semi-annually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning June 15, 2020.
•Issuance costs totaled $17 million. The net proceeds of the January 2020 issuance will be used for general
corporate purposes, including repurchases of common stock.
June 2019 Issuance. In June 2019, we issued two tranches of senior notes.
•The first tranche consisted of $1.0 billion of 2.95% senior notes due June 15, 2029 at a discount of $6 million.
Interest on these notes is due semi-annually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning December
15, 2019.
•The second tranche consisted of $400 million of 3.90% senior notes due June 15, 2047 (the “2047 notes”) at a
premium of $10 million (together with the $1.0 billion of 2.95% senior notes due June 15, 2029, the “June 2019
issuance”). The 2047 notes form a single series with the Company’s $750 million 3.90% senior notes due June
15, 2047 that were issued in June 2017, and have the same terms. The aggregate principal amount
outstanding of the Company’s senior notes due June 15, 2047 is $1.2 billion. Interest on the 2047 notes is due
semi-annually on June 15 and December 15 of each year, beginning December 15, 2019, with interest
accruing from June 15, 2019.
•Issuance costs totaled $10 million. The net proceeds of the June 2019 issuance were used to repay the
Company’s 2.00% senior notes that matured on June 15, 2019 and for general corporate purposes, including
repurchases of common stock.
December 2018 Issuance. In December 2018, we issued four tranches of senior notes.
•The first tranche consisted of $300 million of floating rate senior notes due March 1, 2022 (the “2022 floating
rate notes”). The 2022 floating rate notes bear interest at a variable rate determined quarterly equal to the
three-month LIBOR plus 31 basis points. Interest on the 2022 floating rate notes is due quarterly on March 1,
June 1, September 1, and December 1 of each year, beginning March 1, 2019.
•The second tranche consisted of $700 million of 3.25% senior notes due March 1, 2022 (the “2022 notes”) at a
discount of $2 million. Interest on the 2022 notes is due semi-annually on March 1 and September 1 of each
year, beginning March 1, 2019.
•The third tranche consisted of $1.0 billion of 3.90% senior notes due December 6, 2028 (the “2028 notes”) at a
discount of $7 million. Interest on the 2028 notes is due semi-annually on June 6 and December 6 of each
year, beginning June 6, 2019.
•The fourth tranche consisted of $1.5 billion of 4.50% senior notes due December 6, 2048 (the “2048 notes”) at
a discount of $25 million (together with the 2022 floating rate notes, the 2022 notes and the 2028 notes, the
“December 2018 issuance”). Interest on the 2048 notes is due semi-annually on June 6 and December 6 of
each year, beginning June 6, 2019.
•Issuance costs totaled $22 million. The net proceeds of the December 2018 issuance were used for general
corporate purposes, including repurchases of common stock.
Redemption. All of our senior notes, other than our outstanding floating rate notes, may be redeemed by us at any
time, in whole or in part, at the redemption price plus accrued interest up to the redemption date. With respect to the
1.80% 2020 notes, the 3.25% 2022 notes, and the 5.875% 2036 notes, the redemption price is equal to the greater of
(1) 100% of the principal amount of the notes to be redeemed, or (2) the sum of the present values of the remaining
scheduled payments of principal and interest on the notes to be redeemed that would be due after the related
redemption date. With respect to all other notes, the redemption price is equal to the greater of (1) 100% of the
principal amount of the notes to be redeemed, or (2) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled
payments of principal and interest to the Par Call Date, as defined in the respective notes. Additionally, if a Change in
Control Triggering Event occurs, as defined in the notes, holders of all notes have the right to require us to redeem
those notes at 101% of the aggregate principal amount of the notes plus accrued interest up to the redemption date.
We are generally not limited under the indentures governing the notes in our ability to incur additional indebtedness or
required to maintain financial ratios or specified levels of net worth or liquidity. The indentures governing the notes
contain various customary covenants; however, none are expected to impact our liquidity or capital resources.
50
Table of Contents
Maturities of Long-Term Debt. Our long-term debt maturities, excluding finance leases, follow:
in millions Principal
Fiscal 2020 $ 1,750
Fiscal 2021 2,350
Fiscal 2022 2,250
Fiscal 2023 1,000
Fiscal 2024 1,100
Thereafter 21,050
Total $ 29,500
Derivative Instruments
We use derivative financial instruments from time to time in the management of our interest rate exposure on long-term
debt and our exposure on foreign currency fluctuations.
We had outstanding interest rate swap agreements with combined notional amounts of $2.1 billion at February 2, 2020
and $1.3 billion at February 3, 2019. These agreements were accounted for as fair value hedges that swap fixed for
variable rate interest to hedge changes in the fair values of certain senior notes. The fair values of these agreements
were $120 million at February 2, 2020 and not material at February 3, 2019.
We had outstanding cross currency swap agreements with a combined notional amount of $326 million at February 3,
2019, accounted for as cash flow hedges, to hedge foreign currency fluctuations on certain intercompany debt. The
approximate fair values of these agreements were assets of $121 million at February 3, 2019, which were the
estimated amounts we would have received to settle the agreements and were included in other assets. These cross
currency swap agreements settled during fiscal 2019, resulting in a gain of $118 million.
We also had outstanding foreign currency forward contracts, accounted for as cash flow hedges, which hedge the
variability of forecasted cash flows associated with certain payments made in our foreign operations. At February 2,
2020 and February 3, 2019, the notional amounts and the fair values of these agreements were not material.
At February 2, 2020, we had outstanding foreign currency forward contracts, accounted for as net investment hedges,
with a combined notional amount of $1.2 billion. These agreements hedge against foreign currency exposure on our
net investment in certain subsidiaries. At February 2, 2020, the fair values of these agreements were not material.
5.INCOME TAXES
Tax Reform
On December 22, 2017, the U.S. enacted comprehensive tax legislation with the Tax Act, making broad and complex
changes to U.S. tax law, including lowering the U.S. corporate income tax rate to 21%, transitioning to a modified
territorial system, and providing for current expensing of certain qualifying capital expenditures.
We have elected to pay our transition tax over the eight-year period provided in the Tax Act. As of February 2, 2020, the
remaining balance of our transition tax obligation was $14 million.
The Tax Act also created a new requirement that certain income (referred to as global intangible low-taxed income or
“GILTI”) earned by controlled foreign corporations, or CFCs, must be included currently in the gross income of the
CFCs’ U.S. shareholder. We have elected to account for GILTI in the period the tax is incurred; as such, the Company
has not recorded any GILTI-related deferred taxes.
We expect additional regulatory guidance and technical clarifications from the U.S. Department of the Treasury and IRS
clarifying certain provisions of the Tax Act within the next 12 months. When additional guidance is issued, we will
recognize the related tax impact in the quarter of enactment.
51
Table of Contents
Provision for Income Taxes
Our earnings before the provision for income taxes follow:
in millionsFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
U.S. $ 13,770$ 13,456 $ 12,682
Foreign 945 1,100 1,016
Total $ 14,715$ 14,556 $ 13,698
Our provision for income taxes follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Current:    
Federal $ 2,370 $ 2,495 $ 4,128
State 572 544 499
Foreign 340 372 331
Total current 3,282 3,411 4,958
Deferred:    
Federal 259 67 (67)
State (72) 1 89
Foreign 4 (44) 88
Total deferred 191 24 110
Provision for income taxes $ 3,473 $ 3,435 $ 5,068
Our combined federal, state, and foreign effective tax rates follow:
 Fiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
 2019  2018 2017
Combined federal, state, and foreign effective tax rates 23.6% 23.6% 37.0%
The reconciliation of our provision for income taxes at the federal statutory rates of 21% for fiscal 2019, 21% for fiscal
2018, and approximately 34% for fiscal 2017 to the actual tax expense follows:
in millionsFiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
2019 2018  2017
Income taxes at federal statutory rate $ 3,090$ 3,057 $ 4,648
State income taxes, net of federal income tax benefit 395 443 369
Tax on mandatory deemed repatriation — (62) 400
Other, net (12) (3) (349)
Total $ 3,473$ 3,435 $ 5,068
52
Table of Contents
Deferred Taxes
The tax effects of temporary differences that give rise to significant portions of our deferred tax assets and deferred tax
liabilities follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Assets:   
Deferred compensation $ 169 $ 183
Accrued self-insurance liabilities 285 298
State income taxes 100 96
Non-deductible reserves 156 231
Net operating losses 70 17
Lease liabilities 1,536 —
Other 135 116
Total deferred tax assets 2,451 941
Valuation allowance — —
Total deferred tax assets after valuation allowance 2,451 941
   
Liabilities:   
Merchandise inventories (26) (9)
Property and equipment (1,107) (893)
Goodwill and other intangibles (195) (179)
Right-of-use assets (1,458) —
Other (232) (230)
Total deferred tax liabilities (3,018) (1,311)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ (567) $ (370)
Our noncurrent deferred tax assets and noncurrent deferred tax liabilities, netted by tax jurisdiction, follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Other assets $ 139 $ 121
Deferred income taxes (706) (491)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ (567) $ (370)
We believe that the realization of the deferred tax assets is more likely than not, based upon the expectation that we
will generate the necessary taxable income in future periods.
At February 2, 2020, we had federal, state, and foreign net operating loss carryforwards available to reduce future
taxable income, expiring at various dates beginning in 2020 to 2038. We have concluded that it is more likely than not
that the tax benefits related to the federal, state, and foreign net operating losses will be realized.
Reinvestment of Unremitted Earnings
Substantially all of our current year foreign cash flows in excess of working capital and cash needed for strategic
investments are not intended to be indefinitely reinvested offshore. Therefore, the tax effects of repatriation (including
applicable state and local taxes and foreign withholding taxes) of such cash flows have been provided for in the
accompanying consolidated statements of earnings. We intend to reinvest substantially all of the approximately $3
billion of non-cash unremitted earnings of our non-U.S. subsidiaries indefinitely. Accordingly, no provision for state and
local taxes or foreign withholding taxes was recorded on these unremitted earnings in the accompanying consolidated
statements of earnings. It is impracticable for us to determine the amount of unrecognized deferred tax liabilities on
these indefinitely reinvested earnings due to the complexities associated with the hypothetical calculation.
53
Table of Contents
Tax Return Examination Status
Our income tax returns are routinely examined by U.S. federal, state and local, and foreign tax authorities. With few
exceptions, as of February 2, 2020, the Company is no longer subject to U.S. federal examinations by tax authorities
for years before fiscal 2010. Our U.S. federal tax returns for fiscal years 2010 through 2014 and 2016 to 2018 are
currently under examination by the IRS. With respect to the fiscal years 2010 to 2014, the IRS has issued a proposed
adjustment relating to transfer pricing between our entities in the U.S. and China. We are defending our position using
all available remedies including bi-lateral relief. There are also ongoing U.S. state and local audits and other foreign
audits covering fiscal years 2007 through 2018. We do not expect the results from any ongoing income tax audit to
have a material impact on our consolidated financial condition, results of operations, or cash flows.
Over the next twelve months, it is reasonably possible that the resolution of federal and state tax examinations could
reduce our unrecognized tax benefits by $25 million. Final settlement of these audit issues may result in payments that
are more or less than this amount, but we do not anticipate the resolution of these matters will result in a material
change to our consolidated financial condition or results of operations.
Unrecognized Tax Benefits
Reconciliations of the beginning and ending amount of our gross unrecognized tax benefits follow:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Unrecognized tax benefits balance at beginning of fiscal year $ 494 $ 637$ 659
Additions based on tax positions related to the current year 96 91 74
Additions for tax positions of prior years 82 100 15
Reductions for tax positions of prior years (147) (245) (93)
Reductions due to settlements (13) (66) (1)
Reductions due to lapse of statute of limitations (39) (23) (17)
Unrecognized tax benefits balance at end of fiscal year $ 473 $ 494$ 637
Unrecognized tax benefits that if recognized would affect our annual effective income tax rate on net earnings were
$407 million at February 2, 2020; $398 million at February 3, 2019; and $483 million at January 28, 2018.
Interest and Penalties
Net adjustments to accruals for interest and penalties associated with uncertain tax positions resulted in a benefit of
$14 million in fiscal 2019, a benefit of $33 million in fiscal 2018 and expenses of $24 million in fiscal 2017. Interest and
penalties are included in interest expense and SG&A, respectively.
Our total accrued interest and penalties follow:
in millionsFebruary 2,
2020  February 3,
2019
Total accrued interest and penalties $ 87 $ 101
54
Table of Contents
6.STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Stock Rollforward
A reconciliation of the number of shares of our common stock follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Common stock:   
Balance at beginning of year 1,782 1,780 1,776
Shares issued under employee stock plans 4 2 4
Balance at end of year 1,786 1,782 1,780
Treasury stock:   
Balance at beginning of year (677) (622) (573)
Repurchases of common stock (32) (55) (49)
Balance at end of year (709) (677) (622)
Shares outstanding at end of year 1,077 1,105 1,158
Annual per share cash dividends follow:
 Fiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Cash dividends per share $ 5.44 $ 4.12$ 3.56
Accelerated Share Repurchase Agreements
We enter into ASR agreements from time to time with third-party financial institutions to repurchase shares of our
common stock. Under an ASR agreement, we pay a specified amount to the financial institution and receive an initial
delivery of shares. This initial delivery of shares represents the minimum number of shares that we may receive under
the agreement. Upon settlement of the ASR agreement, the financial institution delivers additional shares, with the final
number of shares delivered determined with reference to the volume weighted average price per share of our common
stock over the term of the agreement, less a negotiated discount. The transactions are accounted for as equity
transactions and are included in treasury stock when the shares are received, at which time there is an immediate
reduction in the weighted average common shares calculation for basic and diluted earnings per share.
The terms of each ASR agreement entered into during the last three fiscal years, structured as outlined above, follow
(in millions):
Agreement
DateSettlement
Date  Agreement
AmountInitial
Shares DeliveredAdditional
Shares DeliveredTotal
Shares Delivered
Q2 2017 Q2 2017  $ 1,650 9.7 1.1 10.8
Q3 2017 Q4 2017  1,200 6.7 0.7 7.4
Q1 2018 Q2 2018  750 3.4 0.8 4.2
Q2 2018 Q3 2018  1,600 7.1 1.0 8.1
Q3 2019 Q4 2019  820 3.2 0.4 3.6
7.FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS
The fair value of an asset is considered to be the price at which the asset could be sold in an orderly transaction
between unrelated knowledgeable and willing parties. A liability’s fair value is defined as the amount that would be paid
to transfer the liability to a new obligor, rather than the amount that would be paid to settle the liability with the creditor.
Assets and liabilities recorded at fair value are measured using a three-tier fair value hierarchy, which prioritizes the
inputs used in measuring fair value.
55
Table of Contents
Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Recurring Basis
Assets and liabilities that are measured at fair value on a recurring basis follow:
 Fair Value at February 2, 2020 Using  Fair Value at February 3, 2019 Using
in millions Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
Derivative agreements –
assets $ — $ 133$ — $ — $ 138$ —
Derivative agreements –
liabilities — — — — (11) —
Total $ — $ 133$ — $ — $ 127$ —
Assets and Liabilities Measured at Fair Value on a Nonrecurring Basis
The carrying amounts of cash and cash equivalents, receivables, short-term debt, and accounts payable approximate
fair value due to the short-term maturities of these financial instruments.
Long-lived assets and other intangible assets are subject to nonrecurring fair value measurement for the assessment of
impairment or as the result of business acquisitions. In the third quarter of fiscal 2019, we completed our annual
assessment of the recoverability of goodwill for our U.S., Canada and Mexico reporting units. The fair values of these
reporting units were estimated using the present value of expected future discounted cash flows through unobservable
inputs (Level 3), and the fair value exceeded the carrying value for each respective reporting unit. Accordingly, no
impairment charges related to goodwill were recorded for these reporting units.
Including goodwill as described above, we did not have any material assets or liabilities that were measured at fair
value on a nonrecurring basis as of February 2, 2020 or February 3, 2019, respectively.
The aggregate fair values and carrying values of our senior notes follow:
 February 2,
2020February 3,
2019
in millions Fair Value
(Level 1)  Carrying
ValueFair Value
(Level 1)Carrying
Value
Senior notes $ 34,102 $ 29,344$ 28,348$ 26,814
8.STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
Omnibus Stock Incentive Plans
The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan (the “2005 Plan”) and The Home
Depot, Inc. 1997 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan (the “1997 Plan” and collectively with the 2005 Plan, the
“Plans”) provide that incentive and nonqualified stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock, restricted
stock units, performance shares, performance units, deferred shares, and other stock-based awards may be issued to
certain of our associates and non-employee directors. Under the 2005 Plan, the maximum number of shares of our
common stock authorized for issuance is 255 million shares, with any award other than a stock option or stock
appreciation right reducing the number of shares available for issuance by 2.11 shares. At February 2, 2020, there
were approximately 123 million shares available for future grants under the 2005 Plan. No additional equity awards
could be issued from the 1997 Plan after the adoption of the 2005 Plan on May 26, 2005.
Stock Options. Under the terms of the Plans, incentive stock options and nonqualified stock options must have an
exercise price at or above the fair market value of our stock on the date of the grant. Typically, nonqualified stock
options vest at the rate of 25% per year commencing on the first or second anniversary date of the grant and expire on
the tenth anniversary date of the grant. Additionally, certain stock options may become non-forfeitable upon the
associate reaching age 60, provided the associate has had five years of continuous service. No incentive stock options
have been issued under the 2005 Plan.
We estimate the fair value of stock option awards on the date of grant using an option-pricing model. We use the Black-
Scholes option pricing model for purposes of valuing stock option awards. Our determination of fair value of stock
option awards on the date of grant using the Black-Scholes option pricing model is affected by our stock price as well
as assumptions regarding a number of subjective variables.
56
Table of Contents
The per share weighted average fair value of stock options granted and the assumptions used in determining fair value
at the date of grant using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model follow: 
 Fiscal Fiscal  Fiscal
 2019 2018  2017
Per share weighted average fair value $ 27.33 $ 32.28 $ 21.85
Risk-free interest rate 2.2% 2.7% 1.9%
Assumed volatility 19.8% 21.3% 19.4%
Assumed dividend yield 2.9% 2.3% 2.4%
Assumed lives of options 5 years 5 years 5 years
The total intrinsic value of stock options exercised follow:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Total intrinsic value of stock options exercised $ 241 $ 138 $ 223
A summary of stock option activity by number of shares and weighted average exercise price follows:
shares in thousandsNumber of
Shares  Weighted
Average
Exercise Price
Outstanding at beginning of year 6,380 $ 91.78
Granted 519 190.66
Exercised (1,649) 58.65
Forfeited (38) 170.25
Outstanding at end of year 5,212 111.54
Shares of common stock issued from stock option exercises are made available from authorized and unissued
common stock or treasury stock.
Details regarding outstanding and exercisable stock options at February 2, 2020 follow:
shares in thousands, dollars in millions, except for per share
amountsNumber of
SharesIntrinsic
Value  Weighted
Average
Remaining Life Weighted
Average
Exercise Price
Outstanding 5,212$ 607 5 years $ 111.54
Exercisable 3,260 470 4 years 84.06
Restricted Stock and Performance Share Awards. Restrictions on the restricted stock issued under the Plans
generally lapse according to one of the following schedules:
•the restrictions on the restricted stock lapse over various periods up to five years; or
•the restrictions on 25% of the restricted stock lapse upon the third and sixth anniversaries of the date of
issuance with the remaining 50% of the restricted stock lapsing upon the associate’s attainment of age 62.
At the grant date of the award, recipients of restricted stock are granted voting rights and generally receive dividends
on unvested shares, paid in the form of cash on each dividend payment date. Additionally, certain restricted stock
awards may become non-forfeitable upon the associate’s attainment of age 60, provided the associate has had five
years of continuous service.
We have also granted performance share awards under the Plans. These awards provide for the issuance of shares of
our common stock at the end of the three-year performance cycle based upon our performance against target average
ROIC and operating profit over that performance cycle. Additionally, certain awards may become non-forfeitable upon
the associate’s attainment of age 60, provided the associate has had five years of continuous service and minimum
performance targets are achieved. Recipients of performance share awards have no voting rights until the shares are
issued following completion of the performance period. Dividend equivalents accrue on the performance shares (as
reinvested shares) and are paid upon the payout of the award based upon the actual number of shares earned.
57
Table of Contents
The fair value of the restricted stock and performance shares is based on the closing stock price on the date of grant
and is expensed over the period during which the restrictions lapse.
Restricted Stock Units and Deferred Shares. Each restricted stock unit entitles the associate to one share of
common stock to be received upon vesting up to five years after the grant date. Additionally, certain awards may
become non-forfeitable upon the associate reaching age 60, provided the associate has had five years of continuous
service. Recipients of restricted stock units have no voting rights until the vesting of the award. Recipients receive
dividend equivalents that accrue on unvested units and are paid out in the form of additional shares of stock on the
vesting date. The fair value of the restricted stock units is based on the closing stock price on the date of grant and is
expensed over the period during which the units vest.
We grant awards of deferred shares to non-employee directors under the Plans. Each deferred share entitles the non-
employee director to one share of common stock to be received following termination of Board service. Recipients of
deferred shares have no voting rights and receive dividend equivalents that accrue and are paid out in the form of
additional shares of stock upon payout of the underlying shares following termination of service. The fair value of the
deferred shares is based on the closing stock price on the date of grant and is expensed immediately upon grant.
Deferred shares granted to non-employee directors follow:
 Fiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Deferred shares granted to non-employee directors 22,000 26,000 27,000
Stock-Based Compensation Activity. A summary of restricted stock, performance shares, and restricted stock unit
activity follows:
shares in thousandsNumber of
SharesWeighted
Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
Nonvested at beginning of year 4,242$ 150.51
Granted 1,652 186.56
Vested (1,597) 134.28
Forfeited (322) 168.09
Nonvested at end of year 3,975 170.58
Stock-based compensation expense, net of estimated forfeitures follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Stock-based compensation expense, net $ 251 $ 282$ 273
At February 2, 2020, there was $379 million of unamortized stock-based compensation expense, which is expected to
be recognized over a weighted average period of two years.
The total fair value of restricted stock, performance shares, and restricted stock units that vested during the fiscal year
follow:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Total fair value vested $ 303 $ 367 $ 309
Employee Stock Purchase Plans
We maintain two ESPPs (a U.S. and a non-U.S. plan). The plan for U.S. associates is a tax-qualified plan under
Section 423 of the Internal Revenue Code. The non-U.S. plan is not a Section 423 plan. At February 2, 2020, there
were 18 million shares available under the U.S. plan and 19 million shares available under the non-U.S. plan. The
purchase price of shares under the ESPPs is equal to 85% of the stock’s fair market value on the last day of the
purchase period, which is a six-month period ending on December 31 and June 30 of each year. During fiscal 2019,
there were 1 million shares purchased under the ESPPs at an average price of $180.87. Under the outstanding
58
Table of Contents
ESPPs at February 2, 2020, associates have contributed $23 million to purchase shares at 85% of the stock’s fair
market value on the last day of the current purchase period, June 30, 2020.
9.EMPLOYEE BENEFIT PLANS
We maintain active defined contribution retirement plans for our associates (the “Benefit Plans”). All associates
satisfying certain service requirements are eligible to participate in the Benefit Plans. We make cash contributions each
payroll period up to specified percentages of associates’ contributions as approved by our Board of Directors.
We also maintain the Restoration Plan to provide certain associates deferred compensation that they would have
received under the Benefit Plans as a matching contribution if not for the maximum compensation limits under the
Internal Revenue Code. We fund the Restoration Plan through contributions made to a grantor trust, which are then
used to purchase shares of our common stock in the open market.
Our contributions to the Benefit Plans and the Restoration Plan follow:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal Fiscal
2019  2018 2017
Contributions to the Benefit Plans and the Restoration Plan $ 213 $ 211$ 202
At February 2, 2020, the Benefit Plans and the Restoration Plan held a total of 6 million shares of our common stock in
trust for plan participants.
10.WEIGHTED AVERAGE COMMON SHARES
The reconciliation of our basic to diluted weighted average common shares follows:
in millionsFiscal  Fiscal  Fiscal
2019  2018  2017
Basic weighted average common shares 1,093 1,137 1,178
Effect of potentially dilutive securities 4 6 6
Diluted weighted average common shares 1,097 1,143 1,184
Anti-dilutive securities excluded from diluted weighted average
common shares — — 1
11.COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
At February 2, 2020, we had outstanding letters of credit totaling $384 million, primarily related to certain business
transactions, including insurance programs, trade contracts, and construction contracts.
We are involved in litigation arising in the normal course of business. In management’s opinion, any such litigation is
not expected to have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial condition, results of operations, or cash
flows.
59
Table of Contents
12.QUARTERLY FINANCIAL DATA (UNAUDITED)
A summary of our quarterly consolidated results of operations follows:
in millions, except per share dataFirst
Fiscal Quarter Second
Fiscal QuarterThird
Fiscal QuarterFourth
Fiscal Quarter
Fiscal 2019:   
Net sales $ 26,381 $ 30,839$ 27,223$ 25,782
Gross profit 9,017 10,432 9,387 8,736
Net earnings 2,513 3,479 2,769 2,481
Basic earnings per share 2.28 3.18 2.54 2.29
Diluted earnings per share 2.27 3.17 2.53 2.28
   
Fiscal 2018:   
Net sales $ 24,947 $ 30,463$ 26,302$ 26,491
Gross profit 8,617 10,365 9,151 9,027
Net earnings 2,404 3,506 2,867 2,344
Basic earnings per share 2.09 3.06 2.53 2.10
Diluted earnings per share 2.08 3.05 2.51 2.09
—————
The fourth fiscal quarter of fiscal 2018 includes 14 weeks; all other quarters in fiscal 2018 and all quarters of fiscal 2019 include 13 weeks.
13.SUBSEQUENT EVENTS
The recent outbreak of the novel coronavirus COVID-19, which was declared a pandemic by the World Health
Organization on March 11, 2020, has led to adverse impacts on the U.S. and global economies and created uncertainty
regarding potential impacts to our supply chain, operations, and customer demand. The pandemic has impacted and
could further impact our operations and the operations of our suppliers and vendors as a result of quarantines, facility
closures, and travel and logistics restrictions. As a result of COVID-19, we have reduced store operating hours,
expanded our paid time off policy for associates, and shifted certain store support operations to remote or virtual. We
are also taking steps in our stores to manage foot traffic to better protect our customers and associates. In addition, in
certain jurisdictions, we have had to cease sales of or delay commencement of work on certain services deemed “non-
life-sustaining.” While the disruption caused by the pandemic is currently expected to be temporary, there is uncertainty
regarding its duration. Therefore, while we expect the pandemic to impact our results of operations, financial position,
and liquidity, we cannot reasonably estimate the impact at this time.
As a result, the Company is taking action to enhance its financial flexibility. In March 2020, we expanded our
commercial paper programs from $3.0 billion to $6.0 billion and suspended our share repurchases. We also entered
into an additional 364-day $3.5 billion credit facility in March 2020, which together with our existing credit facilities
backs up our expanded commercial paper programs.
60
Table of Contents
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements With Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure.
Not applicable.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures.
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We maintain disclosure controls and procedures as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Exchange Act that are
designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed in our Exchange Act reports is recorded, processed,
summarized, and reported within the time periods specified in the SEC’s rules and forms, and that such information is
accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer,
as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
Management, with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, has evaluated the
effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures as of the end of the period covered by this report. Based on
that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have concluded that, as of the end of the period
covered by this report, our disclosure controls and procedures were effective.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting during the fiscal quarter ended
February 2, 2020 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over
financial reporting.
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as
such term is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) promulgated under the Exchange Act. Under the supervision and with the
participation of our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, we conducted an
evaluation of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of February 2, 2020 based on the
framework in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of
the Treadway Commission. Based on our evaluation, our management concluded that our internal control over financial
reporting was effective as of February 2, 2020 in providing reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial
reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP. The effectiveness
of our internal control over financial reporting as of February 2, 2020 has been audited by KPMG LLP, an independent
registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which is included herein.
/s/ CRAIG A. MENEAR  /s/ RICHARD V. MCPHAIL
Craig A. Menear
Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President  Richard V. McPhail
Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
61
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and Board of Directors
The Home Depot, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited The Home Depot, Inc. and Subsidiaries’ (the Company) internal control over financial reporting as of
February 2, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the
Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission. In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all
material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of February 2, 2020, based on criteria established
in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the Consolidated Balance Sheets of the Company as of February 2, 2020 and February 3, 2019, the
related Consolidated Statements of Earnings, Comprehensive Income, Stockholders’ Equity, and Cash Flows for each
of the fiscal years in the three-year period ended February 2, 2020, and the related notes (collectively, the Consolidated
Financial Statements), and our report dated March 25, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion on those Consolidated
Financial Statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying
Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with
the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was
maintained in all material respects. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting included obtaining an
understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness exists, and testing
and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audit also
included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies
and procedures that (1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the
transactions and dispositions of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are
recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted
accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with
authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a
material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Also, projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become
inadequate because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may
deteriorate.
/s/ KPMG LLP
Atlanta, Georgia
March 25, 2020
62
Table of Contents
Item 9B. Other Information.
The Home Depot, Inc. has established a $3.5 billion revolving credit facility (the “Credit Facility”) by entering into a 364-
Day Revolving Credit Facility Agreement dated as of March 23, 2020 (the “Credit Agreement”) with the banks party
thereto, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. and BOFA Securities, Inc. as Joint Lead Arrangers and Joint Bookrunners,
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent for the banks party thereto (in such capacity, the “Agent”) and
Bank of America, N.A., as syndication agent. We currently intend to use borrowings, if any, under the Credit Facility, for
general corporate purposes and to support our expanded commercial paper programs. Commitments under the Credit
Facility will expire, and the Credit Facility will mature, on March 22, 2021. Fundings under the Credit Facility are subject
to conditions customary for financings of this type.
Loans under the Credit Facility will bear interest at a rate per year generally equal to, at our election, either:
•the highest of (a) the interest rate quoted by The Wall Street Journal as the prime rate in the United States; (b)
0.5% plus the greater of (i) the federal funds effective rate and (ii) the overnight bank funding rate, each as
determined by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York; and (c) LIBOR for a one-month interest period plus
1.0%, plus the applicable margin for such loans (“Base Rate Loans”); or
•LIBOR for the selected term which may be one, two, three or six months, plus the applicable margin for such
loans (“Eurodollar Loans”).
The applicable margin for loans will vary depending upon our ratings for senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for
borrowed money. Based upon our current ratings, the applicable margin for Base Rate Loans would be 0.00%, and the
applicable margin for Eurodollar Loans would be 0.950%. In addition, we will pay a facility fee on the commitments
outstanding under the Credit Facility.
The Credit Agreement contains representations and warranties, affirmative and negative covenants, and events of
default customary for financings of this type.
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance.
Information required by this item, other than the information regarding the executive officers set forth below, is
incorporated by reference to the sections entitled “Election of Directors,” “Corporate Governance,” “General,” and “Audit
Committee Report” in our Proxy Statement for the 2020 Annual Meeting of Shareholders (“Proxy Statement”).
Executive officers are appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the Board of Directors. Our executive officers are as
follows:
ANN-MARIE CAMPBELL, age 54, has been Executive Vice President – U.S. Stores since February 2016. From
January 2009 to February 2016, she served as Division President of the Southern Division, and from December 2005
to January 2009, she served as Vice President – Vendor Services. Ms. Campbell began her career with The Home
Depot in 1985 as a cashier and has held roles of increasing responsibility since she joined the Company, including vice
president roles in the Company’s operations, merchandising, and marketing departments. She serves as a director of
Workday, Inc., a financial and human capital management software vendor.
MATTHEW A. CAREY, age 55, has been Executive Vice President and Chief Information Officer since September
2008. From January 2006 through August 2008, he served as Senior Vice President and Chief Technology Officer at
eBay Inc., an online commerce platform. Mr. Carey was previously with Wal-Mart Stores, Inc., a general merchandise
retailer, from June 1985 to December 2005. His final position with Wal-Mart was Senior Vice President and Chief
Technology Officer.
EDWARD P. DECKER, age 57, has been Executive Vice President – Merchandising since August 2014. From October
2006 through July 2014, he served as Senior Vice President – Retail Finance, Pricing Analytics, and Assortment
Planning. Mr. Decker joined The Home Depot in 2000 and held various strategic planning roles, including serving as
Vice President – Strategic Business Development from November 2002 to April 2006 and Senior Vice President –
 Strategic Business and Asset Development from April 2006 to September 2006. Prior to joining the Company, Mr.
Decker held various positions in strategic planning, business development, finance, and treasury at Kimberly-Clark
Corp. and Scott Paper Co., both of which are consumer products companies.
MARK Q. HOLIFIELD, age 63, has been Executive Vice President – Supply Chain and Product Development since
February 2014. From July 2006 through February 2014, he served as Senior Vice President – Supply Chain. Mr.
Holifield was previously with Office Depot, Inc., an office products and services company, from 1994 through July
63
Table of Contents
2006, where he served in various supply chain positions, including Executive Vice President of Supply Chain
Management.
TIMOTHY A. HOURIGAN, age 63, has been Executive Vice President – Human Resources since June 2017. From
February 2016 through June 2017, he served as Division President of the Southern Division. Prior to his role as
Division President, Mr. Hourigan served in various human resources roles with the Company, including Vice President –
Human Resources, U.S. Stores and Operations from September 2013 to February 2016; Vice President –
Compensation and Benefits from February 2007 to September 2013; and Vice President – Human Resources from July
2002 to February 2007.
WILLIAM G. LENNIE, age 64, has been Executive Vice President – Outside Sales & Service since July 2015. From
March 2011 through January 2016, he served as President of The Home Depot Canada, and he served as Senior Vice
President – International Merchandising, Private Brands, and Global Sourcing from March 2009 through March 2011.
Mr. Lennie originally joined the Company in 1992 and held roles of increasing responsibility in the Company’s
merchandising department. In 2006, Mr. Lennie left the Company to be Senior Vice President of Merchandising,
Hardlines for Dick’s Sporting Goods, Inc., a sporting goods retailer, before re-joining The Home Depot in 2009.
RICHARD V. McPHAIL, age 49, has been Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since September 2019.
From August 2017 through August 2019, he served as Senior Vice President, Finance Control and Administration, of
the Company, and was responsible for enterprise financial reporting and operations, financial planning and analysis,
treasury, payments, tax, and international financial operations. From August 2014 to September 2017, he served as
Senior Vice President, Finance, with responsibility for U.S. Retail finance, strategic and financial planning, and
business development activity. Mr. McPhail served as Senior Vice President, Global FP&A, Strategy, and New
Business Development, from March 2013 to August 2014; Vice President, Strategic Business Development, from
January 2007 to March 2013; and director of Strategic Business Development from May 2005 to January 2007. Prior to
joining the Company in 2005, Mr. McPhail served as executive vice president of corporate finance for Marconi
Corporation plc in London, England, where he led their business development efforts in Europe and North America.
Prior to Marconi, Mr. McPhail held positions with Wachovia Securities and with Arthur Andersen.
CRAIG A. MENEAR, age 62, has been our Chief Executive Officer and President since November 2014 and our
Chairman since February 2015. He previously served as our President, U.S. Retail from February 2014 through
October 2014. From April 2007 through February 2014, he served as Executive Vice President – Merchandising, and
from August 2003 through April 2007, he served as Senior Vice President – Merchandising. From 1997 through August
2003, Mr. Menear served in various management and vice president level positions in the Company’s merchandising
department, including Merchandising Vice President of Hardware, Merchandising Vice President of the Southwest
Division, and Divisional Merchandise Manager of the Southwest Division.
TERESA WYNN ROSEBOROUGH, age 61, has been Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate
Secretary since November 2011. From April 2006 through November 2011, Ms. Roseborough served in several legal
positions with MetLife, Inc., a provider of insurance and other financial services, including Senior Chief Counsel –
Compliance & Litigation and most recently as Deputy General Counsel. Prior to joining MetLife, Ms. Roseborough was
a partner with the law firm Sutherland Asbill & Brennan LLP from February 1996 through March 2006 and a Deputy
Assistant Attorney General in the Office of Legal Counsel of the United States Department of Justice from January
1994 through February 1996. Ms. Roseborough serves as a director of The Hartford Financial Services Group, Inc., an
investment and insurance company.
Item 11. Executive Compensation.
The information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the sections entitled “Executive Compensation,”
“Director Compensation,” and “Leadership Development and Compensation Committee Report” in our Proxy
Statement.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder
Matters.
The information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the sections entitled “Beneficial Ownership of
Common Stock” and “Executive Compensation – Equity Compensation Plan Information” in our Proxy Statement.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence.
The information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the section entitled “Corporate Governance” in our
Proxy Statement.
64
Table of Contents
Item 14. Principal Accounting Fees and Services.
The information required by this item is incorporated by reference to the section entitled “Independent Registered
Public Accounting Firm’s Fees” in our Proxy Statement.
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits, Financial Statement Schedules.
The following documents are filed as part of this report:
1. Financial Statements
The following financial statements are set forth in Item 8 hereof:
•Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm;
•Consolidated Balance Sheets as of February 2, 2020 and February 3, 2019;
•Consolidated Statements of Earnings for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018, and fiscal 2017;
•Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018, and fiscal 2017;
•Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018, and fiscal 2017;
•Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for fiscal 2019, fiscal 2018, and fiscal 2017; and
•Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements.
2. Financial Statement Schedules
All schedules are omitted as the required information is inapplicable or the information is presented in our consolidated
financial statements or related notes.
3. Exhibits
Exhibits not filed or furnished herewith are incorporated by reference to exhibits previously filed with the SEC, as
reflected in the table below. Our Current, Quarterly, and Annual Reports are filed with the SEC under File No. 1-8207.
Our Registration Statements have the file numbers noted wherever such statements are identified in the following list of
exhibits. We will furnish a copy of any exhibit to shareholders without charge upon written request to Investor Relations,
The Home Depot, Inc., 2455 Paces Ferry Road, Atlanta, Georgia 30339, via the internet at http://ir.homedepot.com, or
by calling Investor Relations at (770) 384-2871.
Exhibit Description  Reference
3.1
 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation
of The Home Depot, Inc.  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended July 31,
2011, Exhibit 3.1
3.2
 By-Laws of The Home Depot, Inc. (Amended and
Restated Effective February 28, 2019)  Form 8-K filed on March 4, 2019, Exhibit 3.2
4.1
 Indenture, dated as of May 4, 2005, between The
Home Depot, Inc. and The Bank of New York Trust
Company, N.A., as Trustee  Form S-3 (File No. 333-124699) filed May 6, 2005,
Exhibit 4.1
4.2
 Indenture, dated as of August 24, 2012 between
The Home Depot, Inc. and Deutsche Bank Trust
Company Americas, as Trustee  Form S-3 (File No. 333-183621) filed August 29,
2012, Exhibit 4.3
4.3
 Form of 5.875% Senior Note due December 16,
2036  Form 8-K filed December 19, 2006, Exhibit 4.3
4.4
 Form of 3.95% Senior Note due September 15,
2020  Form 8-K filed September 10, 2010, Exhibit 4.1
4.5
 Form of 5.40% Senior Note due September 15,
2040  Form 8-K filed September 10, 2010, Exhibit 4.2
4.6  Form of 4.40% Senior Note due April 1, 2021  Form 8-K filed March 31, 2011, Exhibit 4.1
4.7  Form of 5.95% Senior Note due April 1, 2041  Form 8-K filed March 31, 2011, Exhibit 4.2
4.8  Form of 2.700% Senior Note due April 1, 2023  Form 8-K filed April 5, 2013, Exhibit 4.2
4.9  Form of 4.200% Senior Note due April 1, 2043  Form 8-K filed April 5, 2013, Exhibit 4.3
4.10
 Form of 3.750% Senior Note due February 15,
2024  Form 8-K filed September 10, 2013, Exhibit 4.3
65
Table of Contents
Exhibit Description  Reference
4.11
 Form of 4.875% Senior Note due February 15,
2044  Form 8-K filed September 10, 2013, Exhibit 4.4
4.12  Form of 2.00% Senior Note due June 15, 2019  Form 8-K filed June 12, 2014, Exhibit 4.2
4.13  Form of 4.40% Senior Note due March 15, 2045  Form 8-K filed June 12, 2014, Exhibit 4.3
4.14  Form of 2.625% Senior Note due June 1, 2022  Form 8-K filed June 2, 2015, Exhibit 4.2
4.15  Form of 4.250% Senior Note due April 1, 2046  Form 8-K filed June 2, 2015, Exhibit 4.3
4.16  Form of 3.35% Note due September 15, 2025  Form 8-K filed September 15, 2015, Exhibit 4.3
4.17  Form of 2.000% Senior Note due April 1, 2021  Form 8-K filed February 12, 2016, Exhibit 4.2
4.18  Form of 3.000% Senior Note due April 1, 2026  Form 8-K filed February 12, 2016, Exhibit 4.3
4.19  Form of 4.250% Senior Note due April 1, 2046  Form 8-K filed February 12, 2016, Exhibit 4.4
4.20
 Form of 2.125% Senior Note due September 15,
2026  Form 8-K filed September 15, 2016, Exhibit 4.2
4.21
 Form of 3.500% Senior Note due September 15,
2056  Form 8-K filed September 15, 2016, Exhibit 4.3
4.22  Form of Floating Rate Note due June 5, 2020  Form 8-K filed June 5, 2017, Exhibit 4.2
4.23  Form of 1.800% Senior Note due June 5, 2020  Form 8-K filed June 5, 2017, Exhibit 4.3
4.24  Form of 3.900% Senior Note due June 15, 2047  Form 8-K filed June 5, 2017, Exhibit 4.4
4.25  Form of 2.800% Note due September 14, 2027  Form 8-K filed September 14, 2017, Exhibit 4.2
4.26  Form of Floating Rate Note due March 1, 2022  Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018, Exhibit 4.2
4.27  Form of 3.250% Senior Note due March 1, 2022  Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018, Exhibit 4.3
4.28
 Form of 3.900% Senior Note due December 6,
2028  Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018, Exhibit 4.4
4.29
 Form of 4.500% Senior Note due December 6,
2048  Form 8-K filed December 6, 2018, Exhibit 4.5
4.30  Form of 2.950% Note due June 15, 2019  Form 8-K filed June 17, 2019, Exhibit 4.2
4.31  Form of 3.900% Note due June 15, 2047  Form 8-K filed June 17, 2019, Exhibit 4.3
4.32  Form of 2.950% Note due June 15, 2029  Form 8-K filed January 13, 2020, Exhibit 4.2
4.32  Form of 3.125% Note due December 15, 2049  Form 8-K filed January 13, 2020, Exhibit 4.3
4.33 *Description of Securities   
10.1 †The Home Depot, Inc. 1997 Omnibus Stock
Incentive Plan  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended August 4,
2002, Exhibit 10.1
10.2 †Form of Executive Employment Death Benefit
Agreement  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 3,
2013, Exhibit 10.2
10.3 †The Home Depot Deferred Compensation Plan for
Officers (As Amended and Restated Effective
January 1, 2008)  Form 8-K filed on August 20, 2007, Exhibit 10.1
10.4 †Amendment No. 1 to The Home Depot Deferred
Compensation Plan for Officers (As Amended and
Restated Effective January 1, 2008)  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 31,
2010, Exhibit 10.4
10.5 †The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended May 5,
2013, Exhibit 10.1
10.6 †Amendment No. 1 to The Home Depot, Inc. 2005
Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan and The Home
Depot, Inc. 1997 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 31,
2010, Exhibit 10.6
10.7 †The Home Depot FutureBuilder Restoration Plan  Form 8-K filed on August 20, 2007, Exhibit 10.2
10.8 †Amendment No.1 to The Home Depot
FutureBuilder Restoration Plan  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 2,
2014, Exhibit 10.8
66
Table of Contents
Exhibit Description  Reference
10.9 †The Home Depot, Inc. Nonemployee Directors’
Deferred Stock Compensation Plan  Form 8-K filed on August 20, 2007, Exhibit 10.3
10.10 †The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
Management Incentive Plan (Effective November
21, 2013)  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 2,
2014, Exhibit 10.10
10.11 †The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
Employee Stock Purchase Plan, as amended and
restated effective July 1, 2012  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended April 29,
2012, Exhibit 10.1
10.12 †Form of Executive Officer Restricted Stock Award
Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc. 1997 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended October 31,
2004, Exhibit 10.1
10.13 †Form of Executive Officer Nonqualified Stock
Option Award Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc.
2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 13, 2009, Exhibit 10.4
10.14 †Form of Deferred Share Award (Nonemployee
Director) Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc. 2005
Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on November 15, 2007, Exhibit 10.1
10.15 †Form of Equity Award Terms and Conditions
Agreement Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc. 2005
Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2011, Exhibit 10.1
10.16 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Terms and
Conditions Agreement Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 6, 2013, Exhibit 10.1
10.17 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Nonqualified Stock Option) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 8, 2016, Exhibit 10.1
10.18 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance Based Restricted Stock) Pursuant to
The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 8, 2016, Exhibit 10.2
10.19 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance Shares) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 8, 2016, Exhibit 10.3
10.20 †Form of Deferred Share Award (Nonemployee
Director) Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc. 2005
Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 29,
2017, Exhibit 10.21
10.21 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance Shares) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on February 28, 2018, Exhibit 10.1
10.22 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance Based Restricted Stock) Pursuant to
The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on February 28, 2018, Exhibit 10.2
10.23 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Nonqualified Stock Option) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on February 28, 2018, Exhibit 10.3
10.24 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance Shares) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 4, 2019, Exhibit 10.1
67
Table of Contents
Exhibit Description  Reference
10.25 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Performance-Based Restricted Stock) Pursuant to
The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated
2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 4, 2019, Exhibit 10.2
10.26 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
(Nonqualified Stock Option) Pursuant to The Home
Depot, Inc. Amended and Restated 2005 Omnibus
Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 4, 2019, Exhibit 10.3
10.27 †Form of Executive Officer Equity Award Agreement
Pursuant to The Home Depot, Inc. Amended and
Restated 2005 Omnibus Stock Incentive Plan  Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2020, Exhibit 10.1
10.28 †Employment Arrangement between Craig A.
Menear and The Home Depot, Inc., dated October
16, 2014  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended November
2, 2014, Exhibit 10.2
10.29 †Employment Arrangement between Carol B. Tomé
and The Home Depot, Inc., dated January 20, 2007 Form 8-K/A filed on January 24, 2007, Exhibit 10.2
10.30 †Code Section 409A Amendment to Employment
Arrangement between Carol B. Tomé and The
Home Depot, Inc., dated December 21, 2012  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 3,
2013, Exhibit 10.22
10.31 †Employment Arrangement between Matthew A.
Carey and The Home Depot, Inc., dated August 22,
2008, as amended on September 3, 2008  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 30,
2011, Exhibit 10.36
10.32 †Employment Arrangement between Mark Q.
Holifield and The Home Depot, Inc., dated February
27, 2014  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended February 1,
2015, Exhibit 10.30
10.33 †Employment Arrangement between Edward P.
Decker and The Home Depot, Inc., dated July 29,
2014  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 28,
2018, Exhibit 10.31
10.34 †Employment Arrangement between Richard V.
McPhail and The Home Depot, Inc. dated August
13, 2019  Form 10-Q for the fiscal quarter ended November
3, 2019, Exhibit 10.1
10.35 †Employment Arrangement between Ann-Marie
Campbell and The Home Depot, Inc. dated January
12, 2016  Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 29,
2017, Exhibit 10.29
21 *List of Subsidiaries of the Company   
23 *Consent of Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm   
31.1 *Certification of Chief Executive Officer and
President pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)   
31.2 *Certification of Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)   
32.1 ‡Certification of Chief Executive Officer and
President furnished pursuant Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002   
32.2 ‡Certification of Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer furnished pursuant to Section 906
of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002   
101.INS *XBRL Instance Document - the instance document
does not appear in the Interactive Data file because
its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL
document   
101.SCH*XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document  
68
Table of Contents
Exhibit Description  Reference
101.CAL*XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase
Document   
101.DEF*XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase
Document   
101.LAB*XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase
Document   
101.PRE*XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase
Document   
104
 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as
inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)   
—————
† Management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement
* Filed herewith
‡ Furnished (and not filed) herewith pursuant to Item 601(b)(32)(ii) of the SEC’s Regulation S-K
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary.
None.
69
Table of Contents
SIGNA TURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
(Registrant)
By:  /s/ CRAIG A. MENEAR
  Craig A. Menear, Chairman,
Chief Executive Officer and President
Date:March 25, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the
following persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities indicated as of March 25, 2020.
Signature   Title
/s/ CRAIG A. MENEAR   Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President (Principal Executive
Officer)Craig A. Menear  
/s/ RICHARD V. MCPHAIL   Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer (Principal Financial
Officer and Principal Accounting Officer)Richard V. McPhail  
/s/ GERARD J. ARPEY   Director
Gerard J. Arpey   
/s/ ARI BOUSBIB   Director
Ari Bousbib   
/s/ JEFFERY H. BOYD   Director
Jeffery H. Boyd   
/s/ GREGORY D. BRENNEMAN   Director
Gregory D. Brenneman   
/s/ J. FRANK BROWN   Director
J. Frank Brown   
/s/ ALBERT P. CAREY   Director
Albert P. Carey   
/s/ HELENA B. FOULKES   Director
Helena B. Foulkes   
/s/ LINDA R. GOODEN  Director
Linda R. Gooden   
/s/ WAYNE M. HEWETT   Director
Wayne M. Hewett   
/s/ MANUEL KADRE   Director
Manuel Kadre   
/s/ STEPHANIE C. LINNARTZ   Director
Stephanie C. Linnartz   
70
Table of Contents
THE HOME DEPOT, INC.
SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
 Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal Fiscal
amounts in millions, except per share data or where noted 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
STATEMENT OF EARNINGS DA TA     
Net sales ($) 110,225  108,203 100,904  94,595 88,519
Net sales increase (%) 1.9  7.2 6.7  6.9 6.4
Earnings before provision for income taxes ($) 14,715  14,556 13,698  12,491 11,021
Net earnings ($) 11,242  11,121 8,630  7,957 7,009
Net earnings increase (%) 1.1  28.9 8.5  13.5 10.5
Diluted earnings per share ($) 10.25  9.73 7.29  6.45 5.46
Diluted earnings per share increase (%) 5.3  33.5 13.0  18.1 15.9
Diluted weighted average number of common shares 1,097  1,143 1,184  1,234 1,283
Gross profit – % of sales 34.1  34.3 34.0  34.2 34.2
Total operating expenses – % of sales 19.7  20.0 19.5  20.0 20.9
Net earnings – % of sales 10.2  10.3 8.6  8.4 7.9
     
BALANCE SHEET DA TA AND FINANCIAL  RATIOS     
Total assets ($) 51,236  44,003 44,529  42,966 41,973
Working capital ($) 1,435  1,813 2,739  3,591 3,960
Merchandise inventories ($) 14,531  13,925 12,748  12,549 11,809
Net property and equipment ($) (1)22,770  22,375 22,075  21,914 22,191
Long-term debt, excluding current installments ($) 28,670  26,807 24,267  22,349 20,789
Stockholders’  (deficit) equity ($) (3,116 ) (1,878 ) 1,454  4,333 6,316
Total debt-to-equity (%) (1,010.4 ) (1,555.0 ) 1,858.9  544.7 335.9
Inventory turnover 4.9x 5.1x 5.1x 4.9x 4.9x
     
STATEMENT OF CASH FLOWS DA TA     
Depreciation and amortization ($) 2,296  2,152 2,062  1,973 1,863
Capital expenditures ($) 2,678  2,442 1,897  1,621 1,503
     
OTHER METRICS     
Return on invested capital (%) 45.4  44.8 34.2  31.4 28.1
Cash dividends per share ($) 5.44  4.12 3.56  2.76 2.36
Number of stores 2,291  2,287 2,284  2,278 2,274
Retail square footage at fiscal year-end 238  238 237  237 237
Comparable sales increase (%) (2) (4)3.5  5.2 6.8  5.6 5.6
Sales per retail square foot ($) (3)454.82  446.86 417.02  390.78 370.55
Customer transactions (3)1,616  1,621 1,579  1,544 1,501
Average ticket ($) (3)67.30  65.74 63.06  60.35 58.77
Number of associates at fiscal year-end (in thousands) 415  413 413  406 385
—————
Note: Fiscal 2018 includes 53 weeks. All other fiscal periods disclosed include 52 weeks. This information should be read in conjunction with MD&A
and our consolidated financial statements and related notes.
(1)Includes finance leases.
(2)The calculations for fiscal 2017, fiscal 2016, and fiscal 2015 do not include results for Interline, which was acquired in fiscal 2015.
(3)These amounts do not include the results for Interline, which was acquired in fiscal 2015.
(4)Fiscal 2019 compares the 52 week period in fiscal 2019 to weeks 2 through 53 in fiscal 2018. Fiscal 2018 calculations do not include results
from the 53rd week of fiscal 2018 and compare weeks 1 through 52 in fiscal 2018 to the 52 week period in fiscal 2017.
F-1
